 
 
The Failed Presidency.
 
 
Would you consider the Bush presidency a "FAILED PRESIDENCY." If so why? Have there been in your opinion any successes?
 
 
This is sort of "what is the meaning of is?" question. Superficially no, but I do not think most people understand just how atavistic this administration is. The underlying goal of both Bush Sr and Bush Jr is to undo the New Deal. Historians have written reams about the depression and the impact of the New Deal to ameliorate it effects. But they have paid very little attention to the response of the wealthy to its programs, the taxing policies that funded it, and the regulatory policies that curbed the excesses of late 19th early 20th century capitalism. Roosevelt yanked this country into a wholly new direction because the trend up to that point had been toward an increased divergence between the wealthy elite and everyone else. There was considerable resistance among the wealthy, including a bumbling attempt to organize a coup (the general that they tried to enlist ratted on them). If the trends that marked this country up to 1933 had not been stopped, we would look socially and economically more like South America then the broad based middle class society we have experienced for the last fifty or sixty years. The Bush family come out of that elites whose social and economic ambitions were effectively curbed by the New Deal and they did and do deeply resent it. In that regard the Bush administration has been relatively successful because that South American social and economic model or more precisely the pre 1933 social/economic model is exactly where he and the radical Republicans are taking us. And it seems. that most of the country could care less
 
 
The legacy of Bush's failed presidency
By Anonymous

(Editor's note: This column was written by a Washington, D.C.-based political analyst and friend of Aspen Daily News columnist Connie Harvey who prefers to remain anonymous.)
WASHINGTON -- It is accepted wisdom in this town that while the Bush administration is stumbling on economics and domestic policy, it has its real strength in national security and international affairs. This is unfortunately not the case -- and as the depth and staggering costs of Bush's weakness on international issues becomes clear, we will see the hallmarks of a failed presidency.
Yes, a failed presidency. You heard it here first, but it will soon be the buzz on the political circuit.
Domestically, the evidence is overwhelming. Between 1992 and 2000, this nation worked its way from the vast deficits of Bush I ($300 billion) into our first real surplus in 40 years. In only one year, Bush II has thrown us back into at least a decade of deficits, and all to pay for a tax cut to the wealthiest 10 percent of Americans. One has to look back to Louis XIV to see such profligate irresponsibility on a national level. And his deficit leaves Bush unable to use the usual Keynesian tools to end a recession.
Other domestic issues are equally damning. We have the most anti-environmental president in history; we are suspending civil rights in wholesale fashion; health-care costs are skyrocketing with no plan to control them in sight; Bush's election commission is gutting the recently passed campaign finance reform. And on. There are simply no significant, successful domestic policies under Bush, and many deeply worrying failures.
Now all of this might be ignored if Bush, Cheney, Rumsfeld, Powell and Rice were protecting this nation from terror and building national security in the world. But, as I will demonstrate, nothing could be further from the truth.
The Bush administration's foreign policy can be characterized as aggressive unilateralism, wherein this nation pushes whatever policies it likes, whenever and wherever, with no regard to political considerations in other countries or political realities on the ground. Even that might be OK if our leaders were imbued with omniscience. American interests have been asserted with healthy results in hundreds of occasions over the last two centuries.
But the assertions made by Bush and Company are anything but omniscient. They are in fact the most blinkered policies our nation has ever proffered. Start with the small stuff: In the last 18 months, we have thrown away treaties on biological warfare, criminal justice and women's rights. We are one of only two states -- in cozy company with Somalia -- that have failed to ratify the 1989 Convention on Children's Rights. We have walked away from arms-control treaties with Russia. And to the outrage of almost every other nation in the world, the United States, with nearly 30 percent of global greenhouse emissions, has thrown away the Kyoto Treaty.
So let's forgive these transgressions, since we are at least winning the war on terror. Right?
Wrong. It is worth looking at some recent history. The first thing that the Bush foreign-policy team did upon entering office is disassociate itself with everything Clinton was working on, simply because it was Clinton's work. This was unbelievably bad judgment.
The most astonishing article I have read in years was in last week's Time magazine. It said: "A bold (Clinton) plan for the U.S. to attack al Qaeda was delayed by a Bush administration 'policy review process' and was approved just a week before September 11."
Let's revisit that statement. This plan to destroy al-Qaida was presented in detailed briefings by Clinton's national security advisor to the incoming Bush administration national security advisor, Condoleeza Rice, in January 2001. It was shelved for nine months -- despite the Clinton team's warning that this was one of the most significant issues they would face. Finally, in the week before Sept. 11 it was dusted off and approved. The costs of that delay are incalculable -- and inexcusable.
In that same nine months prior to Sept. 11, the Bush team walked away from a near-deal between North and South Korea. More dangerously, they abandoned the incredible amount of hard work Clinton had put into negotiating a peace treaty between the Palestinians and Israel -- and thus eroded U.S. credibility in the region. The Bush attitude was, basically, that the Israelis and Palestinians have to figure it out for themselves.
In fact, the United States has no cogent policy for the Israeli-Palestinian conflict. The administration has sent envoys in and out, sometimes working with Arafat and sometimes condemning him. Although Arafat was elected democratically, Bush now says there can be no progress until he is gone. (In the meantime, despite the fact that 15 out of the 19 hijackers were Saudi, and that regime is as far from democracy as possible, the administration has nary a word of criticism for our oil-supplying friends.)
The American disengagement in the Middle East is unforgivable. It is tossing matches in that powder-keg region. Consider the implications on our current goal to oust Saddam Hussein. Vice President Cheney recently went to rally Mideast nations around a move to get rid of Hussein. He failed utterly. President Clinton explains why: "It's very important to realize that these people didn't do that because they love Saddam Hussein. They can't stand Saddam Hussein," Clinton said. "They thought the United States was on another planet, talking about attacking Saddam Hussein when we were not involved in the Middle East peace process at the time."
A New York Times opinion piece recently said, "The randomness of American rhetoric on the Middle East is becoming its most distinctive pattern."
The United States will never be freed of terrorist threats unless we have a serious approach to the Middle East. For that, we need a foreign policy run by sophisticated, intelligent, dedicated people. Rumsfeld, Cheney and Rice are clearly unable to enunciate any cohesive policy, and are proudly unwilling to take advice from other nations, or pay attention to local conditions, or consider the work of their predecessors. Powell seems more adept, but is apparently emasculated by the other three.
The Bush presidency is a failed presidency. It has only the most bitter domestic legacy, and has put foreign policy, and thus our national security, in shambles. We cannot afford such negligence.

This article was obviously written before the debacle in Iraq.
 
 
Bush's presidency did not fail. He lead by honor valor and compassion. It's a shame that only by the numbers and the money the people so selfishly worry about the economic status and the deficit budget in the powerful capitalistic america! Money is not what bush ruled by but by the unselfish drive to no longer take the same shit the clinton administration put up with in the world of international politics. And so selfishly these people have the audacity to talk about money, what about the welfare of the other people? This is not a matter of numbers, as far as concerning the success of the presidency, it's all about character and wisdom!
 
 
Character...        

...and wisdom      

You mean murder and deceit? Something wrong with your keyboard?

John Judge:

 
They have spent $13 trillion tax dollars since the end of WWII on this military/intelligence complex, and it cannot protect its own headquarters?... How were they allowed to come into the most restricted air space in the world with no challenge or defense? That is the question that answers both when Bush knew in advance and begs any rational response.
 
 
 
THe ReDHoRN

 
He leads by honor valor and compassion,
 
honesty, don't forget honesty!      
 
 
redhorn:  you need this! 
 
 
So then you didn't really want anyones opinion on this topic, you just wanted to blast Bush and the people that support him? Way to continue looking like the jackasses that you are.
 
 
McGentrix,

Remember when you complained about personal attacks? How do you reconcile that with calling people jackasses?
 
 
Hey, If the shoe fits...
 
 
That does nothing to address the hypocracy.
 
 
True. My statement is somewhat hypocritical. But a question was raised, a reply given and then that reply was ridiculed and laughed at instead of discussed. What else would you call someone who does that?
 
 
You opened a whole thread to complain about vebal harassment that was not on that level. If you think the "shoe fits" excuse is a valid one then why complain when others want to choose your footwear?
 
 
And look at all the good it did.
 
 
Fools rush in where mortals fear to tread.

I think it can be called the failing Presidency -- the poll numbers slip day by day in support of this presidency and he is now behind in how many would vote to reelect him. He's taking his "working vacation" to plan the strategy to get reelected but in the meantime he could easily become a lame duck President (not in the usual way but just by setting aside action to concentrate on getting reelected). His heart might be in the right place but his head is somewhere where the sun don't shine.
 
 
McGentrix,

There are a few conservatives here who are rarely if ever flamed. If you want tips on how to respond see their posts. I'm not the guy to ask.

But now you understand when I didn't take your complaints seriously. You come here to goad, brag about it on other sites, and then complain about how you are treated.
 
 
 
McGentrix,

There are a few conservatives here who are rarely if ever flamed. If you want tips on how to respond see their posts. I'm not the guy to ask.

But now you understand when I didn't take your complaints seriously. You come here to goad, brag about it on other sites, and then complain about how you are treated.
 

What I do on other sites is none of your, or anyone elses business.
 
 
I never claimed it was my business. That does not change anything. If you don't want people to see you gloating about annoying liberals don't gloat about it on a publically accessible site.
 
 
 
I think it can be called the failing Presidency
 

Agreed. It hasn't failed yet.

Keep watching...this is what 'meltdown' looks like, in progress.
 
 
Yet, how did you find the site in question? It is a private site. I don't think you googled for it...
 
 
It's not a private site. It's publically accessible, that's kinda like saying "a private billboard". How I found it isn't your business :wink: but yes, I found it in a search (not Google) for Able2Know. As you were talking about how fast you were able to annoy liberals ON Able2Know it came up in the search.
 
 
What craven said. Reading back over the posts here, McG contributed nothing of interest, fact, or opinion. But does become a crybaby when his very own complaints are turned against him (or her).

And I hadn't thought about it, craven but you make a good point. A good number of people use different boards - few limit themselves to just one. And the boards are public, once one registers. So what is said is there to read.

If McG had bothered to read the question, then respond to it, that's one thing. But there is a disturbing pattern to what McG does. The entries are usually to come in, call names, attack, then sulk and pout. There is rarely information or informed opinion.

There are quite a few conservatives who are knowledgeable, informed, and interested in discussion. And a lot of discussions take place, quite often combined with some friendly banter.

In other words, McG, if you dish it out, be prepared to take it.

No, craven I can't think of any accomplishments. The failures are many, if you are talking about this country and its people. And Afghanistan has really got to start showing as an example. But, if you are talking about personal gain, then it's another story.
 
 
 
It's not a private site. It's publically accessible, that's kinda like saying "a private billboard". How I found it isn't your business :wink: but yes, I found it in a search (not Google) for Able2Know. As you were talking about how fast you were able to annoy liberals ON Able2Know it came up in the search.
 

Yeah, I also said what a great place it was. Some of the liberals here are still easy to annoy and even easier to ignore. Others have some great points to share and are worth my time.
 
 
I can't help but agree. Usually the ones who people look forward to reading are worth emulating.

Like I said, there are conservatives here who are well respected. Same goes for liberals of course.
 
 
First of all there is nothing wrong with my keyboard second of all who in the hell is the president murdering. War=people die. Those who chose to retaliate were those who died and they are "dipshits" did we not try to defend and help the country? think rationally here. If your dropping bombs and moving in infantry into a city and the "innocent" were to told to evacuate and they dont of course some of them are going to die. There irrationality got them killed. It's evolution get over it and god bush must be proud to be on the top of the food chain so quit jealously knocking him off! If you got a problem go vote about it if you dont vote and complain then dont say anything. And if you think you were president and you can bring peace to iraq without killing anyone on accident, tough luck!
 
 
The only numbers that should be considered here are the number of Americans who are proud and foreigners who are proud to join us because of Bush's "not taking shit from no one" foriegn policy! Because of that peace will be restored here after. People are going to die but who said you dont make sacrifices for justice?
 
 
Huh?
 
 
I second that. Huh?
 
 
 
The only numbers that should be considered here are the number of Americans who are proud and foreigners who are proud to join us because of Bush's "not taking shit from no one" foriegn policy! Because of that peace will be restored here after. People are going to die but who said you dont make sacrifices for justice?
 

That's true, people will die,and those people won't care one way or another.If you believe like the appointed president does, then I guess they will have peace in the hearafter. That's great. But...its the living I'm concerned with.  
 
 
 
First of all there is nothing wrong with my keyboard second of all who in the hell is the president murdering. War=people die. Those who chose to retaliate were those who died and they are "dipshits" did we not try to defend and help the country? think rationally here. If your dropping bombs and moving in infantry into a city and the "innocent" were to told to evacuate and they dont of course some of them are going to die. There irrationality got them killed. It's evolution get over it and god bush must be proud to be on the top of the food chain so quit jealously knocking him off! If you got a problem go vote about it if you dont vote and complain then dont say anything. And if you think you were president and you can bring peace to iraq without killing anyone on accident, tough luck!
 

Re; the bringing peace statement...doesn't peace usually invove the absence of killing?  
 
 
THe ReDHoRN

 
Because of that peace will be restored here after.
 

If you mean peace will be restored in the hereafter, I agree. However, who wants to wait for death to bring peace??    
 
 
McGentrix get over yourself dude. You're yelling into an empty room. Subject closed.
 
 
Has this just turned into some nightmarish version of the Bill Maher show or is it me?
 
 
Naaahh... I'm MUCH cuter than Bill Maher.  
 
 
The Bush unPresidency have been a complete and utter failure. It is a prefect example of what not to do  
 
 
Like I said due to the ignorance of human nature, those who bring terror can only understand war! It's a cold hard fact and believe it or not such force can only create some level of peace but never in it's purest form. There are sacrifices to be made. The country and those people had a choice to live or die either flee the city, or surrender! They chose to die. Options were given, they chose their own paths. That is the best we could have done. If only the way Ghandi did things then could work now! Oh yeah...if i sounded a little aggressive in posts, I apologize because im on my menstrual cycle!!  
 
 
 
Like I said due to the ignorance of human nature, those who bring terror can only understand war! It's a cold hard fact and believe it or not such force can only create some level of peace but never in it's purest form. There are sacrifices to be made. The country and those people had a choice to live or die either flee the city, or surrender! They chose to die. Options were given, they chose their own paths. That is the best we could have done. If only the way Ghandi did things then could work now! Oh yeah...if i sounded a little aggressive in posts, I apologize because im on my menstrual cycle!!  
 

Looking at your profile page and seeing how young you are, I hope that you mellow as you get older. Many of us have been in combat, and its not fun or glorious, or anything good. People die in horrible awful ways,and usually the ones hurt the worst are the ones who are the least involved in combat. No one on either side chose to die, or deserved to die.
 
 
Do you watch FOX TV and were you constantly updated on the war? I understand that those people didn't deserve it but what I was saying that the situation could have been avoided!
 
 
I prefer to call it a "sinking ship." Most people think we're still floating okay. Maybe the water level needs to be up to their eyeballs before they see we're sinking. Oh, well..... ci
 
 
The latest grand statements by this president is that "the current deficit will be cut in half in five years." Not verbatim, but close - the meaning doesn't change.  
 
 
 
Do you watch FOX TV and were you constantly updated on the war? I understand that those people didn't deserve it but what I was saying that the situation could have been avoided!
 

You aren't going to find much support for FOX as a news source from either side around here. It has proven itself to have zero credibility.  
 
 
I fail to see how anyone could say that his is the best we could have done -- of course, history is something written ten to twenty years after events and hoping that the facts don't get lost in the interpretation, I don't believe the historians will be kind to Dubya. We are just now finding out that Nixon very likely gave the order for the break in at Watergate! That was only a sympton of a very sick Presidency even considering the opening up of relations with China, something many conservative Republicans seem to now wish had never happened. It's not that anyone was issued an ultimatum and decided they would not do what we wanted them to do -- it's what is happening there right now and I believe we've fueled the terrorism, playing right into Al Queda's hands (among others). The terrorist recruiting now seems to be enjoying a huge resurgence. If one lives in Texas but far enough away from the ranch, I wouldn't sweat it. If you live close, that's not cow manure you're smelling.
 
 
After their attack on Al Franken, writing all sorts of editorial crap in the civil complaint against using "fair and balanced," I have lower my respect rating for FOX News down to 2. Colmes is the only reason for the 2.
 
 
Do tell!
 
 
I meant this was the best the nation could of done with a president with the IQ of 80!
 
 
 
I meant this was the best the nation could of done with a president with the IQ of 80!
 

Aren't you boosting it a bit? I've taken care of long term heroin addicts that had a better grip on reality than Bushy-Poo II.
 
 
And a C average in Harvard Business School which he used to dupe investors into buying his company -- very likely with the books fixed to make it look good. I'm sure Daddy was able to fix that one for him too. The business, of course, failed -- perhaps because the principals were all out getting drunk at a Planet Hollywood...
 
 
Fine 60, I only wanted to establish here that there must be some form of respect for the idiot with a good heart!
 
 
LMAO!!! Red! Nothing like pure honesty.

I would like to suggest that you read more news articles and political journals before you let yourself (PMS or no) get so fired up about defending Bush's presidency. It sounds to me like you're just using info that you've heard others say without first trying to see all viewpoints in the arguement or to educate yourself on the matter.

 Arts and Letters Daily  has a great selection of articles and links to newspapers and journals from all over the world and representing many different political views. Especially if you're going to get involved in the political threads around here, you need to be able to back up what you're saying.

You should paruse the older threads here, too -- you could learn a lot.

By the way, to answer the original question, Bush is a miserable failure. I don't think I could add anything else that someone else hasn't mentioned. The economy, foreign relations, war, deceit, greed, cronyism...Bush is dangerous.
 
 
On second thought, it couldn't have been Planet Hollywood -- with that kind of bad service, nobody could get drunk.
 
 
Does rush limbaugh count as a credible source? Or how about the san antonio news paper, you have to understand texas is vastly conservative! And there is no such thing as radical opposition to bush where I come from and if so you would probaly get your ass kicked! However all i hear about is the conservative perspective. Politics is plain and simple there is no grey and research, it's knowledge acquired through results. And the results show that many people are content with Bush and many foreign countries and their leaders love him! THAT'S MY BUSH!  
 
 
But this idiot with a good heart is very dangerous to mankind and all living things on this planet.
 
 
he's an idiot he doesnt know that he was just trying to lower our prices on oil and get the man that tried to kill his daddy!    
 
 
Austin's a litte more middle of the road. San Antonio was the land of hairspray and peroxide when I was there in '90 and '98.
 
 
Now it has strip clubs and pregnant teenagers working in strip clubs! Along with vegans and closet liberals!
 
 
 
he's an idiot he doesnt know that he was just trying to lower our prices on oil and get the man that tried to kill his daddy!    
 

He's 0 for 2, Red.

BTW, I would also dispute "good heart". No one has killed more innocent people --on Death Row, in Afghanistan, in Iraq--than this man.

Ask that Iraqi boy who lost his family and his arms if Bush is a Christian man with a good heart.  
 
 
 
Now it has strip clubs and pregnant teenagers working in strip clubs! Along with vegans and closet liberals!
 
\
Hmmm...sounds like Baltimore.  
 
 
Death row is a different subject i'll let you be the judge of those men on death row! What about the innocent babies those certain democrats and liberals had the nerve to slaughter? And no bush wasn't in the plane dropping bombs or carrying a machine gun! think about it!
 
 
 
Death row is a different subject i'll let you be the judge of those men on death row! What about the innocent babies those certain democrats and liberals had the nerve to slaughter? And no bush wasn't in the plane dropping bombs or carrying a machine gun! think about it!
 

What on earth are you talking about?

 
And no bush wasn't in the plane dropping bombs or carrying a machine gun! think about it!
 

Bush' questionable Texas ANG service has been a much discussed topic here, believe me!
 
 
 
Death row is a different subject i'll let you be the judge of those men on death row!
 

I was actually referring to Karla Faye Tucker, the woman that Dubya mocked right before he killed her. She was far from innocent, but she converted to Christianity, and by all accounts was a reformed and redeemed person. Did God tell Bush to execute her as he did the thousands of women and children in Iraq who couldn't get out of the bombs' way fast enough?

(remainder edited for civility)
 
 
 
  IM TALKING ABOUT HOW BUSH WASNT RESPONSIBLE FOR THE LOSS OF THAT CHILD.
 

As the person who ordered the attack, he bears the ultimate responsibility. You might want to look into some of the precedents set by the Nuremberg Trials.
 
 
Maybe im cruel and unjust or maybe all republicans from texas are that way! If your smart enough you would know what I am talking about! Is it wrong to like bush? Why have this discussion if your going to continue to argue with me. You people just want to argue, not have a civil intellectual discussion here. This was intended for the sole purpose to exchange ideas now it has become personal!   WHy do you continue to persist? Maybe because you feel inferior? Or maybe because you dont have anything better to do but argue with people, do me a favor and grow up!
 
 
 
For all the days and nights he spends raising record amounts of money, why doesn't he pay a visit - even just one - to the family of an American who lost his life obeying his Commander In Chief? Could it be that Mr. Bush is afraid he'll be asked why he injudiciously taunted Iraq's insurgents with "Bring 'em on?" They came on, all right. Could it be that it would be hard to come clean with those who mourn, hard to convince them that the threat for which their loved ones died looks contrived? Or might campaign cash just be more important?
 

 Bush needs to come clean 
 
 
Is it wrong to like Bush? No. He is a very Charismatic individual. I'm sure he's a hell of a guy to down a few with. I ahve always had great respect for Rice, as well. I just think that no matter how they are as people, they have made some horrible policy decisions, and need to be removed from power. The last president whom I think may have actually really been a good person all of the time is Carter.
 
 
OK, having gotten reamed for my slug fest with Percy this past weekend, can we all pretend to play nice? Honestly, I see better behaviour from my 8 y.o. white belts!
 
 
Okay, guys, cool it. No name calling, please. Stick to topic. Thx, c.i.
 
 
My dad can beat up BOTH your dads, with both arms and one leg tied behind his back!AND you can swing FIRST!
 
 
C'mon, now, kids... poke at the politicians and their policies, not one another.

That said, I'm no big fan of Bush The Younger. Since I don't see "Anyone But" as a realistic option, and none of The Democrats really looks like a winner at least for the present, I suspect he'll be around a while. Though things domestic and foreign are not as rosy as The Administration tries to portray them, they're nowhere near as dire as The Media and The Opposition present them either. Leading Indicators, such as Machine Tool Orders, Inventory Levels, and stabilization of unemployment, along with slow but steady growth of the world stock market valuations, stability of energy prices and consumer spending, and the declining potential for tension on the order of the runup to Desert Freedom all point to a secure seat for The Sitting President. Just a noticeable, even if gradual, overall improvement in the domestic economy over the next year, with continued negligible inflation and relatively low interest rates, likely would be enough to lock up the election. As far as warchest funding goes, the Dems are currently at something like a four-to-one dissadvantage... a mighty big hole for a minority party to climb out of and mount a successful challenge from, even if blessed with a strong candidate, and a distinc,t proactive platform. If Osama or Saddam happen to come to a public end, or the WMD or Terror Link questions turn out to Bush's advantage, heck, that's just a bonus. This time next year, I wouldn't be too surprised to see The Major Issues bein' Iran, North Korea, Judicial Nominations, and Domestic Energy Infrastructure Redevelopment... along with Israel/Palestine, of course. At this point, about the only way to get George out of office would involve a state funeral... and then there'd be Cheney. Careful what you wish for.
 
 
Stretched thin
Big shortage of supplies for forces in Iraq, brass admits

By RICHARD SISK
DAILY NEWS WASHINGTON BUREAU
WASHINGTON - Humvees are running on bald tires, and tank treads are falling off armored vehicles as the Army's supply chain is stretched as thinly as the troops in Iraq, top officers and enlisted soldiers said yesterday.The always difficult job of getting beans and bullets to the field also has been complicated in Iraq by increasing Army commitments around the world, Gen. Paul Kern, head of the Army Materiel Command, said at the Pentagon."We haven't closed down Afghanistan, we've still got people operating in the Balkans and I've got my eye on Korea," Kern said. "So we can't take all the resources of the U.S. Army and send them all to Iraq."Kern and three sergeant majors on duty in Iraq said the Army has a two-month backlog for Humvee tires and a three-month wait for treads on Abrams tanks and Bradley fighting vehicles.Kern said the demand for Bradley treads is so great that the Army has been sending replacements by air rather than by sea. "That's a pretty expensive way to move track, but that's what we're doing," Kern said.Much of what has been supplied also can't be used because of mismatches in the logistics chain, said Sgt. Maj. Michael Bush, the top enlisted soldier in the 1st Armored Division."I've got air conditioners stacked up all over the place" to give troops relief from the 120-plus-degree heat, Bush said.But "there's a problem with getting the electricity and power generation in the quantity and size that we need to power everything," Bush said.Sgt. Maj. Charles Fuss of the 4th Infantry Division said his troops lack generators for the air conditioners. With generators at a premium in Iraq, "We're having to go outside this country to try to purchase them because the commercial power is undependable," Fuss said.Some war planners may have misjudged how long peacekeeping would take in Iraq, and how many troops would be needed, Kern said."Some did, some didn't," Kern said. "It's a question of, 'Did you do enough?' The answer right now is, 'Probably not.'"Despite the shortages, morale is high for troops who "walk with death every day out on patrols," said Sgt. Maj. Kenneth Prescott of the Army's V Corps."What the enemy doesn't understand is, the more they attack us, the more fight we'll take to them," Prescott said.

Another failure of the Bush administration. Rumsfeld was warned that we were too thin in men and I would suppose the equipment and he scoffed at it time after time in interviews. Come to think of it I haven't heard from that clown lately.
 
 
Thanks for re-opening.

Red and I exchanged some apologies via PM last night and will contain ourselves.

I'm going back now to edit.
 
 
Timber

 
That said, I'm no big fan of Bush The Younger. Since I don't see "Anyone But" as a realistic option, and none of The Democrats really looks like a winner at least for the present,
 

Indeed the democratic candidates are not a sterling group, or don't appear to be so however, you don't know how good a fruit is until you have tasted it. Well, we tasted Bush and he has turned out to be bitter. Almost any of them would be a better choice than Bush. How could they be worse?
 
 
News flash - judge sends FOX NEWS packing in a negative judgement and admonition regarding their claim that Al Franken can't use "Fair and Balanced" on the cover of his book.  
 
 
Nobody was enthusiastic for Carter or Clinton this early in the campaign, either. Takes time for an old fashioned steamroller to get there.
 
 
LW - and the judge said this was an easy case. That to trademark a phrase that is and has been in common use is......................ludicrous? That this was definitely parody. Fox threatens to take it further.
 
 
This administration refused to listen to the good advise of General Eric Shenseki who told Rummy and company that it would take 200,000 troops after the war. They turned around and repremanded him, because they didn't agree. General Shenseki is no more, and what we have left are the bozos that will not listen to the experts. The carnage against US military after the war is the responsibility of this administration and Rummy. c.i.
 
 
FOX is continuing to show how they've climbed to the top by groveling to the right (fair and balanced, indeed) and the kind of pettiness involved in the text of their complaint would put the National Enquirer to shame. They have gradually turned into a new form of tabloid media. I'm sure we will see Franken show up on the Jon Stewart and Bill Maher shows.
 
 
The Failed Presidency. -------------

Even Al Franken would be better. It would serve the Republicans good to find a new candidate for 2004 instead of a criminal!!!!!!!
 
 
Funny, I used to cringe when people would call any of our Presidents a crook, but now Bush has mananged to make it just like calling the Pope catholic.
 
 
Gees, with Nixon, Reagan, BushI, BushII - and even Clinton (those his criminals acts were to protect his family - not deceive the nation)!

Gosh LW, looks like a required trait!
 
 
LW
Is he a crook or just does not know any better. Let's face it they do not try the mentally deficient in a court of law simply because they are not able to distinguish right from wrong. I am beginning to believe Bush fits in that category. Can't read, speak in coherent sentences and is incapable of cogent thought.    
 
 
 
Funny, I used to cringe when people would call any of our Presidents a crook, but now Bush has mananged to make it just like calling the Pope catholic.
 

Which makes one wonder...does a George poop in the woods?  
 
 
This George is devine, no pooping allowed - it is used for gray matter  
 
 
I see all the A2K sand is in the left side of the box.

Run Dean, PLEASE.
 
 
Bush Visits Bellevue:  Bush in Bellevue, Wa. 
BUSH'S WELCOME WAGON
Eastside Bushies Confront Protesters

by Mahrya Draheim and Alexis Lainoff

At Bellevue Square, a few miles from the tony Hunts Point fundraiser where President Bush nabbed $2,000 from each attendee during his August 22 visit, a couple of hundred demonstrators clogged the corner of Northeast Eighth Street and Bellevue Way, shouting at passing drivers, who honked in return.

These folks weren't upset that Bush was visiting Washington State, though. Instead, they were thrilled, and out in force to support the president, protesting the anti-Bush activists who assembled in four locations in Seattle and on the Eastside. The standoff centered around Bellevue Square, where a pro-Bush rally was just a few blocks from an anti-Bush demonstration at Northeast Fourth Street and Bellevue Way.

Gary Jensen, a pastor from Burien, came to the rally without costume or sign, explaining he was simply there to add support: "I think Bush is doing great. He's a president who means what he says."

When asked to specify what Bush policies he supported, Jensen was particularly vocal about the war. "The war in Iraq was the right thing to do," says Jensen. "Weapons of mass destruction will be found."

In its early hours, the Republican rally seemed like your typical patriotic flagfest. At 10:00 a.m. organizers passed out stickers to like-minded rallygoers amid a ragged chorus of "FOUR MORE YEARS!" Some drivers responded to signs beckoning "Honk if you love Bush" by blaring their horns. (A few, who probably think WMDs won't be found, responded with a raised middle finger.)

One run-of-the-mill Bush supporter, a man with a foam-rubber cowboy hat, set up his camp of flags and army action figures right next to a prim elderly woman and a family of four.

Though Republicans tend to have a rep for homogeneity, the rally at Bellevue brought out their diversity. A yarmulke-wearing young man and his girlfriend waved the Star of David. The Tacoma-area Vietnamese community was represented by more than a dozen people, carrying a banner and occupying prime curb space.

"We came to support Bush's war on terrorism," says Dang Lamp, a Tacoma resident. "Terrorism is just like Communism. It has to be taken care of before it spreads."

Lamp doesn't see the current economic slump as anything to chide Bush about. "The economy goes in cycles," Lamp says. "It's on its way back up."

The pro-Bush camp had plenty of competition at Bellevue Square. At Northeast Fourth Street, 200-plus anti-Bush protesters were on hand to counteract the Bush support. Though they were centered four blocks away--victims of the Bushies' forethought in getting a permit for the more prominent corner of Northeast Eighth Street--the anti-Bush protesters couldn't resist having a bit of fun with the opposition. A half-dozen anti-Bush protesters aped their wealthy conservative counterparts, emerging from a limousine, decked in furs, at a prominent spot on the pro-Bush curb. "Thank you, Bush! You've made us richer than we ever imagined.... Thank you for the tax cuts!" the middle-aged protesters declared. Republicans didn't know what to think at first.

But quick-thinking Lori Sotello, Republican rally organizer, swept in to create a diversion. Sotello immediately motioned for members of the pro-Bush crowd to stand in front of the limo, blocking the faux millionaires.

The back-and-forth continued all afternoon. By 12:30 p.m., the GOP crowd was peppered with liberal interlopers as anti-Bush demonstrators abandoned their designated post to infiltrate the pro-Bush rally down the street. ("We followed the guidelines," Sotello said, explaining the pro-Bush folks' decision to stay put. "Others chose not to.") The result was a heated exchange (a "public dialogue," as one anti-Bush organizer called it)--at times a shouting match--between the two sides, covering everything from the legitimacy of the war in Iraq to the effectiveness of Bush's tax cuts.

"It was an opportunity for discussion," says Sotello tactfully, adding that many of the GOP attendees enjoyed the debate. One protester, a middle-aged lady with frosted lipstick and an American-flag shirt, seemed to be having an especially good time shouting, "Communists go home! If you don't love this country, then get out of here!"

© Copyright 2003 TheStranger.com

w
 
 
 
I see all the A2K sand is in the left side of the box.

Run Dean, PLEASE.
 

sand to the left...shit to the right...... :wink:  
 
 
Stand up, sit down, fightfightfight.
 
 
If you have not seen Eric Blumrich's excellent Flash about Katherine Harris and the Florida Stealection,  then click here. 
 
 
cjh, The sand is shifting slowly, but it is shifting, and it's not shifting to the left. It's shifting to the right to bury this administration from this country - for good. c.i.
 
 
Turning into an avalanche  
 
 
Cheney has disappeared. Rummy seems to be on the run. Nobody pretends anything about Bush's month-long vacation (was he missed?). The Gov of Arkansas (rep) decides not to run for senator against the democrat - says he want to spend his time fixing the education system. Janklow, in SD, gets indicted on manslaughter 2 - so guess he's not running against Daschle. Boise, Idaho, rejects Ashcroft on the Patriot Act - and they're a solid republican state. Bustamante doing better than Arnie in CA.

What is happening? Deus ex machina?
 
 
You can fool some of the people all of the time, All of the people some of the time. But you can't fool all of the people all of the time.
 
 
Idaho
One of this state's most prominent politicians, Rep. C.L. "Butch" Otter (R), is leading an effort in Congress to curtail the centerpiece of Ashcroft's anti-terrorism strategy, the USA Patriot Act. Sen. Larry E. Craig (R-Idaho), who used to croon alongside Ashcroft in a senatorial quartet, said this month that Congress may have to consider scaling back parts of the law. And in a state with an all-GOP congressional delegation, several city councils and the legislature are considering resolutions condemning Ashcroft's tactics in the war on terrorism.

"Ashcroft wants more power," said state Rep. Charles Eberle (R-Post Falls), who has drafted a resolution critical of the Patriot Act. "What a lot of us in Idaho are saying is, 'Let's not get rid of the checks and balances.'... People out here in the West are used to taking care of themselves. We don't like the government intruding on our constitutional rights."
 
 
They don't understand, this stuff is necessary to continue the Fascist agenda of the current administration......
 
 
dys, I'm glad to see that some people in local governments sees the danger of the Patriot Act, and their willingness to strip it of it's intrusion into our Constitutional Rights. c.i.
 
 
Bush took a month's vacation. Wasn't missed. Would he be for another month? The little president who wasn't.
 
 
He's like the wizard behind the curtain in "The Wizard of Oz." "Don't pay any attention to that man behind the curtain" as he's pulling levers and hitting switches to run the country. Trouble is, he hasn't any brains, heart or courage.
 
 
LW, Rove made sure those levers and switches weren't attached to anything  
 
 
Empire of Novices
By MAUREEN DOWD

WASHINGTON

The Bush foreign policy team always had contempt for Bill Clinton's herky-jerky, improvised interventions around the world. When it took control, it promised a global stewardship purring with gravity, finesse and farsightedness.

But now the Bush "dream team" is making the impetuous Clinton look like Rommel.

When your aim is remaking the Middle East, you don't want to get stuck making it up as you go along.

Even officials with a combined century of international experience can behave with jejeunosity — if they start believing their own spin.

The group that started out presuming it could shape the world is now getting shoved by the world.

Our unseen tormentors are the ones who seem canny and organized, not us. As they move from killing individual U.S. soldiers and Iraqis to sabotaging power plants, burning oil pipelines, blowing up mosques, demolishing the U.N. headquarters and now hitting the Baghdad police headquarters, our enemies seem better prepared and more committed to creating chaos in Iraq — and Afghanistan — than we are to creating order.

They've also proved more adept at putting together an effective coalition than the Bush team: a terrifying blend of terrorists from other countries, Al Qaeda and Ansar al-Islam fighters, radical Shiites and Saddam remnants, all pouring into Iraq and united by their hatred of America.

If we review the Bush war council's motives for conquering Iraq, the scorecard looks grim:

• We wanted to get rid of Osama and Saddam and the Taliban and Al Qaeda. We didn't. They're replicating and coming at us like cockroaches. According to Newsweek, Osama is in the mountains of Afghanistan, plotting to use biological weapons against America. If all those yuppies can climb Mount Everest, at 29,000 feet, can't we pay some locals to nab Osama at 14,000 feet?

• Bushies thought freeing Iraq from Saddam would be the first step toward the Middle East road map for peace, as well as a guarantee of greater security for Israel. But the road map blew up, and Israel seems farther away from making peace with the Arabs than ever. The U.S. has now pathetically called on Yasir Arafat to use his power to help after pretending for more than a year that he didn't exist.

• Rummy wanted to exorcise the stigma of Vietnam and prove you could use a lighter, faster force. But our adventures in Iraq and Afghanistan may not banish our fears of being mired in a place halfway around the world where we don't understand the language or culture, and where our stretched-thin soldiers are picked off, guerrilla-style.

• The neocons wanted to marginalize the wimpy U.N. by barreling past it into Iraq. Now the Bush administration is crawling back to the U.N., but other nations are suspicious of U.S. security and politics in Iraq.

• Dick Cheney and Rummy wanted to blow off multilateralism and snub what Bushies call "the chocolate-making countries": France, Germany, Belgium and Luxembourg. But faced with untold billions in costs and mounting casualties in Iraq and Afghanistan, Americans are beginning to see the advantages of sidekicks that know the perils of empire.

• The Pentagon wanted to sideline the C.I.A. and State and run the war and reconstruction itself. Now, overwhelmed, the Pentagon's special operations chiefs were reduced to screening a 1965 movie, "The Battle of Algiers," last week, as David Ignatius reported in The Washington Post, to try to learn why the French suffered a colonial disaster in a guerrilla war against Muslims in Algiers.

• The neocons hoped democracy in Iraq would spread like a fever in the Mideast, even among our double-dealing friends like Saudi Arabia and Pakistan. But after the majestic handoff of democracy to the 25-member Iraqi Governing Council, it seems the puppets (now nervous about bodyguards) don't even want to work late, much less govern. As one aide told The Times, "On the Council, someone makes a suggestion, then it goes around the room, with everyone talking about it, and then by that time, it's late afternoon and time to go home."

• The vice president wanted to banish that old 60's feeling of moral ambivalence, of America in the wrong. Our unilateral move in Iraq, with the justifications on W.M.D. and Qaeda links to Saddam getting shakier each month, has made us more hated around the world than ever.
 
 
What do you expect from a group of people that began by stealing an election?
 
 
Acquiunk
Certainly not the stupidity we have been presented with.
 
 
 

Counties carried by Bush: 2,434 (Total Population 143 Million+)
Counties carried by Gore: 677 (Total Population 127 Million+)

Despite the Democrat's failed attempt to use the judicial system to subvert the election results, the Electoral College served its design function and prevented an imbalance of urban sentiment from skewing the election. The situation which arose in 2000 was foreseen by the Founding Fathers, who were determined to assure the Presidential Election was decided by the Nation as a whole, not by those who concentrated in the cities. While denying Bush The Younger a clear mandate, the 2000 election nonetheless reflected the opinion of the nation as a whole. Those uncomfortable with the facts are left with three choices: leave, change the law or live with it. Whining doesn't change the facts. For 2004, there will be no similar controversy, I'm sure. If indeed there were any realistic potential to replace Bush the Younger this cycle, you may rest assured Hillary would be at the forefront of the charge. Realizing that The Republicans are presently unassailable, Hillary contents herself with waiting for '08, when there will be no distracting scramble for the Democratic Candidacy, and, of course, no Democratic Incumbent to frustrate her plans. It'll be up to the electorate to do that... and the way things look, its likely to work out to the continued dismay of the Democrats.

Also, I find it odd that the Republicans are characterized as "Stupid", and otherwise denigrated and belittled by so many of the Democrats. There's a logical falacy there; who has outsmarted whom? Now, if necessary, I'll humbly eat crow if and when the time comes, but I doubt crow will be on the menu at any Republican Dinners for a long, long time. Those folks don't take politics as a joke, do not nominate losers, and do not underestimate or mischaracterize their opponents.
 
 
Very kewl Timber. Thanks for that post. Though I live in a far left "blue" spot, I take strong protest with people who refer to the middle of the country as "flyover" territory. My home state of Michigan is one of the most influential states in the country, being the home of the auto industry as well as several influential universities.

People who have never spent any time on the big lakes also tend to dismiss them in favor of the oceans. That's fine by me, there's already way too many people trying to find lakefront property, which I am lucky to already own.
 
 
Astounding Timber. Do you really believe what you've posted, or are you playing devil's advocate?

For the record, I don't think Republicans are stupid. If they were, I'd be better able to forgive them. The bad ones -- the ones who are invested in Bush in spite of all the evidence that he is malign AND corrupt -- are not what I'd call "real Republicans." The others, the real ones, are beginning to stand up and/or (depending on how you look at it) leave a sinking ship. Most Republicans I know are embarrassed, even (in a couple of cases) apologetic. "I've voted Republican my whole life; my father did too; my wife comes from a Republican background. We're horrified. We started to realize what was happening with Patriot Act 1. We didn't believe Iraq was in any way connected to 9/11. I can't tell you we're going to vote Democratic in the next election, but I can tell you we won't vote the current group back into office." That's what a friend in Austin said to me yesterday, in so many words.

You write: "I doubt crow will be on the menu at any Republican Dinners for a long, long time. Those folks don't take politics as a joke..." You're right about that, but I don't think you should be proud of it, as a Republican.
 
 
There are real Republicans in Austin?
 
 
If there's anything to being a proud republican today, it certainly can't be the way this administration has ruined this country and the world for the past three years. What's to be proud of the war with Iraq, our loss of credibilty with the world community, loss of jobs at home, increased national debt, loss of life and money in Iraq, and the infringement of our Contitutional Rights? Yeah, tell me about it.
 
 
If that's smart, I prefer dumb any ole day.
 
 
And how, Cjhsa! Too many! Fancy, sprawling suburbs, you know, Hummers and Sequoias and private schools.
 
 
HeHeHeHe... [snicker]timber[/snicker]

Figgered that'd get the conversation movin  
 
 
T he last days of the Oregon Legislature may have been muddled and bitterly divided, with narrow victories and angry words between Democrats and Republicans. But as legislators prepared their long-delayed escape, one loud bipartisan message came out of Salem:
The Oregon State Senate really doesn't like the USA Patriot Act.

By a vote of 23-2 -- in a capitol specializing in hairs-breadth victories -- senators voted to "implore the United States Congress to correct provisions of the UPA and other measures that infringe on civil liberties and oppose any future federal legislation to the extent that it infringes on United States residents' civil rights and liberties," and went on to directly endorse the Murkowski-Wyden bill that would cut the Patriot Act back sharply.

Oregon senators may have a cloudy outlook on taxes, but -- from both parties -- they have a pretty clear view of rights. "The use of government power to constrict their liberties," explains Sen. Tony Corcoran, D-Cottage Grove, "is something both the left and the right fear."
 
 
Good for the Oregon legislature. A tiny bit of hope is encouraging, when all else seems to be going down the toilet.
 
 
According to a report in The Washington Post, support for the Patriot Act is waning in the country, including Idaho, where Ashcroft's summer revival tour traveled this week. Idaho's Rep. C.L. "Butch" Otter (R), is leading an effort in Congress to curtail the centerpiece of Ashcroft's anti-terrorism strategy, the USA Patriot Act. Otter sponsored an amendment approved 309 to 118 by the House in July, which would cut off funding for "sneak-and-peek" warrants. Ashcroft calls this a "mistake," and says that those who voted for the amendment "did not know what they were voting for." Also voting yea was Sen. Larry E. Craig (R-Idaho), a former singing mate of Ashcroft's in the senate quartet, who now is singing dissident chords about the law.

State representatives and city counsels in Idaho are making discordant noises, no doubt a reflection of a state in which people value their privacy and liked the Constitution the way it was before Ashcroft started playing it in another key.

New Harris Poll numbers indicate that less than 50 percent of those polled like the show's star, and 40 percent disapprove of his performance. And as long as Ashcroft continues to hum the tune that those who would curtail the Patriot Act and not grant Ashcroft new powers are traitors, his popularity is likely to drop.

This is a country that, save for the Rove's, Falwell's, Robertson's, and Ashcroft's in it, believe in the right to dissent and debate. Ashcroft's words that he "values debate" and does not want to silence it, is belied by his deputizing his US Attorneys to speak personally with dissident Congressional members and report back to him. Report what? They they disagree? To what end? That they can be prosecuted as national security risks?

"It's pretty reckless to say that 309 members of Congress want to tip off terrorists," said Otter, who noted that more than a third of the votes cast for his amendment came from Republicans. "Instead of hitting the campaign trail, the attorney general should be listening to the concerns that many Americans have about some portions of the act."
 
 
Maybe, just maybe, people are beginning to see how dangerous this administration really is.
 
 
Some yes, some never had any doubt and some still have the blinders on!!!!
 
 
Consider that one of the FOX-fed stated on another thread that Ashcroft's patriot act was a shining example of American democracy.  
 
 
"fair an balanced"  
 
 
hobit, Betcha they didn't offer the opposing view.
 
 
I read the "failing presidency" with interest.

However, I am unable to find, outside of a few crabbed sites like the Nation and/or the Village Voice anyone who is willing to say that the Administration has failed in all of its objectives and will go down to defeat in the election in November.

The Demographers, usually objective chaps, point out that the Democratic Senators who will be running in 2004 mainly come from states which Bush won handily in 2000 and that the Republican Senators running, with two exceptions, come from states which Bush also won in 2000.

With some of the re-districting programs being handled by the Republicans in Colorado and Texas, it is difficult to see how the Republicans could lose the House.

It is possible, of course, that there could be a Republican House, a Republican Senate and a Democrat President.

Not much would get done.

But, maybe that would be the most desirable end.
 
 
U.S. Said to Shift Approach in Talks With North Korea

By DAVID E. SANGER

WASHINGTON, Sept. 4 — President Bush, in a significant shift in his approach to North Korea, authorized American negotiators to say last week that he is prepared to take a range of steps to aid the starving nation — from gradually easing sanctions to an eventual peace treaty, senior officials today.
Macho man is gradually finding out that diplomacy does not include the forcing of your will upon an adversary. Or was it Condi Rice who finally understood and explained it to the vacuum headed Bush.

 http://www.nytimes.com/2003/09/05/international/asia/05NUKE.html?th 
 
 
I think that's possible, Italgato. That's why I think we also need to change the make-up of Congress. In fact I'm not sure that the latter isn't more important than changing the presidency.
 
 
Delay DeLay in '04!
Put him back on the "small bus" where he belongs!
 
 
I'll tell ya, Hobit, I'd like to see DeLay out the door first and publicly defeated. But close behind are many members of Congress of both parties -- of BOTH parties! -- who have been very remiss in their obligations to constituents, who go along to get along, who justify their votes by implying they know more than we do. I don't think they do. Part of this is the arrogance of leadership; a contributing factor has been the laziness of the electorate.
 
 
A split government, as Italgate mentions, as been more or less the norm for the past fifty years in this country. Mostly it has been a Democratic congress and A Republican president.
 
 
My understanding of the situation is that oposition of ececutive and legislative branches is the most healthy way for a system to work. When a party has too much power, like now, there is a tendency for the national interests to take second place to partisan interests.
Hmmm...I smell pork....
 
 
It must be a BBQ in Crawford - $2,000 a plate, get 5 minutes with one of the twins behind the bush  
 
 
I have little use for George Bush, but I think that kind of reference to his daughters in uncalled for, just as it was for Bill Clinton's daughter.
 
 
Yeah, I agree with Acquiunk; disparaging his daughters is uncalled for.
 
 
That's exactly the mindset on the part of The Left that guarantees The Republicans overwhelming superiority in the coming election. Ya piss off The Center, and ya lose big. The Left has set its course.
 
 
Or we nab you for rampant exaggeration, Timber! Or is Ashcroft on your side?
 
 
Given all the political mud that has be thrown around in the last 10 years, I doubt that disrespectful comments about the president's daughters will have much political impact one way or another. I simply think it is in poor taste and lowers the level of political discourse. Which is pretty low to begin with, thanks mostly to Republicans.
 
 
Bingo, Aqui!
 
 
Not specifically talkin about disparaging the daughters, here... I'm concerned that the nastiness directed by the Left, particularly its most strident fringes, toward The Current Administration is driving The Center from any wish at all to even consider The Left might have some viable alternatives to offer. Bush-Bashing is what's gonna lose the election for The Dems.
 
 
timber, What do you consider "bush-bashing?" Deserved, not deserved, or silence?
 
 
I have no complaint at all with substasntive criticism, and I'll grant that much of that is merited. There is a difference between carping and criticism, however... and between ad hominem attack and refutation of argument. I sense The Left is doing a lot of carping and name-calling. "Bush is Bad" and "Rove/Rummy/Ashcroft/Wolfowitz etc. are evil incarnate" don't get any points from the main audience, no matter how well it may play to the peanut gallery. The problem the Democrats face is that they have no program of alternatives, they have no leadership, they have no focus other than "The Current Administration has to go". With what do they propose to replace The Current Administration, and in what ways and by what means would that replacement better the current situation? Who do they have to champion their cause? What, apart from Anti-Bush, is their cause?Where's the beef? There's plenty of ketchup and bun, but no meat in their sandwich. They've got time yet to get it together, but I don't see them working towards that at all.
 
 
timber, I generally agree with your assessment; that the democrats lack any sense of purpose and leadership. However, I think carping is part and parcel of the political arena, and that's not going to change from one party or the other, and that's not about to stop because there's no beef. As for the four horsemen, most of the adjectives used are pretty accurate; they are all short-sighted and dangerous to our people and economy. Why else do they realize things have gone from bad to worse so late in the game? They're supposed to be the 'experts,' and protect us from these mistakes in leadership.
 
 
Timber -- I think you are projecting something onto the left which you are blind to on the right. Don't forget: the Democrats were put through an appalling and unjustifiable "impeachment" proceeding. The invective from the right about Clinton, about liberals -- well, it was pretty bad, indefensible. What I see in your post, above, is a self defense, not so much a defense of the administration. Please post something in which you defend -- with all your might -- the Bush administration policies which the "left" has been complaining about. You may discover that we agree on many issues and that you are using your own disappointment as a rationale for calling us angry.

The "meat" is justice and clean government, security (real security, not "Homeland Security")and health care, fair wages and a balanced budget, prosperity and equity. If you read beyond the headlines, look beyond Fox, I think you'll get beyond anger.
 
 
Well, for one thing, Tartarin, The Bush Economic Policy is working just fine. Jobs Growth, the only lagging indicator, is always the last thing to show recovery. By Forth Quarter '03, that too will be showing sustained growth. Current manufacturing capacity, even given productivity increases, is approaching the point which will call for substantial investment in physical plant and labor force to sustain the already clearly established upward economic trends... trends which are global, not just domestic. The strongest indicators of continued and accellerating growth are the recent substantial, consistent increases in Machine Tool Orders (Machine Tools are the things that make the machines that make things that people buy... and those new machines are gonna need operators), and historically low Inventory Levels across a broad spectrum of marketing segments. As Autum wears on, the machines will be cranking out lots of stuff to restock those empty shelves and warehouses in advance of the Winter Selling Season (which accounts for over a third of the consumer economy). The Tax Cuts are working. I expect the labor picture to improve dramatically, following what is the current bottom of its trough.
 
 
 
I sense The Left is doing a lot of carping and name-calling. "Bush is Bad" and "Rove/Rummy/Ashcroft/Wolfowitz etc. are evil incarnate" don't get any points from the main audience, no matter how well it may play to the peanut gallery. The problem the Democrats face is that they have no program of alternatives, they have no leadership, they have no focus other than "The Current Administration has to go". With what do they propose to replace The Current Administration, and in what ways and by what means would that replacement better the current situation? Who do they have to champion their cause? What, apart from Anti-Bush, is their cause?Where's the beef?
 

This is the Bush platform, what he ran on exactly. Just change left to right, Democrat to Republican and reverse the names. I'm not saying the Dems will follow the scenerio, but it is all the air that Bush protrayed. It is also the way he has run the government to date. There is nothing put out there in advance, it's a throw together to defend mistakes. There has been a public call for leadership and responsibility, but ignored, since Mar/Apr, certainly May timeframe for costs - we just got a request in Iraq for $60 billion above and beyond the $3-4 billion a month operating costs. And this is expected to go above $100 billion with a total of in excess of $500 billion total.

It is hypocritical to say what one party can do, the other can't. Arnold Schwarzenegger is trying to pull a "Bush" in California - now there is no substance!
 
 
Gotta go with re Ah-nowld, there, Bill. There's a sad joke waiting for a cruel punchline. Hell, it'll serve him... and California, right if he does win.
 
 
Timber, you claim (correctly) that the trend is global. How do you reconcile that with saying that Bush's plans have worked?

IMO, the coming (yes, nay sayers beware) upturn has as little to do with Bush as the downturn did except in that sitting presidents get the blame (and credit) in the most loosely contructed post hoc ergo propter hoc connections that can be made.
 
 
Bill, you point out somethign very relevant. Running against the incumbent is almost always done by running as opposition.

Timber has faulted the Dems for not having a coherent platform (they don't) except for the opposition to the current swwing to the right.

But to be fair you must include that this is part of politics. It's always easier to point out what is being done wrong than come up with solutions that will sound good in sound bytes.

Running as opposition is a sane political tactic. But I agree in that Dems need a coherent platform. They are being too reactionary and need to show some testicular fortitude.
 
 
Good point there, CdK... but Bush The Younger will get the credit nonetheless... and actually, I do see his current policies as being a good part of the impetus behind overall ongoing global economic recovery.
 
 
I just posted an article from the NYTimes (today), Timber, which lays out a case for bad time ahead, based on a structural problem in the economy. They also felt there will be a strengthening in the fourth quarter, but that it will be temporary and superficial (my words).

My own feeling is that we have to look not just at corporate profits but at what is done with those corporate profits -- who gets them, profiteers? or workers via newly created jobs?

Craven -- How do you factor the massive tax cuts into that picture? Some pretty respectable economists are worried that the tax cuts and the deficit have put a stake through the heart of the economy.
 
 
Timber,

I don't think Bush's plans can be credited for Global economic recovery at all. After 9/11 the uncertainty factor really crippled economies. Bush generated a new uncertainty factor with Iraq that dragged on and on.

Once the war started there was an economic sigh of relief but that was the antidote to the ailment he brought on.

Other than those things Bush has not done much toward global economics.

Tartarin,

i do not support the tax cuts without a reduction in spending. But I don't think the tax cuts effect the economy much one way or the other.

The tax cuts are a very serious issue when it comes to the defecit (and there is a remote chance that the defecit might actually hurt America some day) but are unrelated (in either a substantially positive or negative way) to the current economic situation.
 
 
 
But to be fair you must include that this is part of politics. It's always easier to point out what is being done wrong than come up with solutions that will sound good in sound bytes.
 

Never portray anything when the opponent has flaws, especially large ones. However, no campaign in my lifetime has run on so little as Bush did. There is so little required of him. The Dems have already proposed more in two debates than he proposed in 18 months.

If Bush keeps up alienating the middle and working class, as in taking away the 60 year old overtime ruling, he is a goner. This was brought out by more than one candidate last night, as with the repeal of his taxes for the wealthy. I think it is near sighted to say the Dems stand for nothing - pure poppycocK!!!
 
 
Whether or not the Dems stand for anything it is true that they have been suffering an identity crisis since the end of teh Clinton era.

That they aren't able to articulate their platform and pump up their candidates is not indicative of them not standing for anything but it is, indeed, a problem and IMO a problem that will cost them the upcoming election.

The Dems shoulda had the balls to call the Iraq bluff.
 
 
Well, I think you're right about global economics, Craven. But as for the tax cuts being unrelated, I'd only agree with you up to a point: nothing Bush has done is unrelated (anymore any other president). The economy is not separate from daily life.

There may be some people cheering at the very top, feeling nice and secure. But the bottom 90% are feeling the pinch, all right, right through the middle class whose tax cuts are having less impact than they might have wished, but upon whom unemployment is having enormous impact. From realtors to banks to small businesses to new car dealers (the ones that aren't selling Hummers), fewer people buying goods and services means less income. So you get back $800 in tax cuts; and you lose 3, 4, 5, 15, thou in income because your used car lot + taco stand just aren't getting the buyers they did three years ago. So that 800 you and the wife were going to use to vacation in the Keys has been used up on groceries and medical insurance.

Meanwhile, in the wings, is the great monster of national credit card debt, growing bigger every day...
 
 
Back to presidential daughters(The result of a day on campus exposed to those horrible,evil, pernicious women in summer clothing):
Chelsea Clinton is an accomplished young lady, who has done well academically and deserves respect.
Jenna,(I think) is also apparently academically accomplished,and is doing well at Yale, better than her father did, which isn't difficult..
Barbara is at UT Austin living the partying life of a sorority chick, and that is quite alright too. they are 21, fer pete's sake!
Criticism of them (and I have been guilty of it, too) is probably in poor taste. Now their fathers, on the other hand, are bipedal paraodies.  
 
 
It gets tighter by the day Craven - there isn't a national theme until Mar/Apr - especially after last nights debate the Dems looked united against Bush. They just neeed to stay away from back stabbing.

There isn't suppose to be a platform until next summer. Bush is compelled to performance - the Dems want to stay loose until the summer. If they tie themselves down completely now, they destroy the flexibility of time! No hurry, Bush keeps digging a hole.........
 
 
hmm, I actually think American debt is a good think as far as the big picture is concerned. Americans are the poorest people in the world when you consider the average amount owed.

But all that credit is where much of the economy's size is. If you ahve 100 dollars but have access to 100 dollars of credit for the economy's purposes there is 200 dollars circulating.

Since the debt is internal (most Americans owe Americans) it's really just a big neat "virtual" economy. It hurts the small guy to pay an American corporation his hard earned money but the money eventually goes back into the circulation.

The tax cuts simply won't make much of a difference for the better or for the worse in the short term. I do see long-term inplications in that they could make the deficit an issue that will need to be addressed perhaps in drastic manner but the economic woes predate the tax cuts.

IMO, the realization that the brick and mortar world is not separate from teh "virtual" world is the biggest responsible factor. In retrospect it's glaringly obvious that businesses that banked on the "virtual" were only going to make "virtual" money. the success stories on the internet are almost always brick and mortar based.

The internet has been undergoing a slow transition from.edu to.com. there are growing pains while people figure out how to do business. At first they thought that the internet was a new way to make money when in reality it's just a new medium and a new way to collect money.

The misperceptions and consequent indulgence of the dot coms during the bubble are, IMO, the single most relevant factor in the economic downturn with the psychological ramifications of 9/11 and the subsequent american militarism coming second.
 
 
 
hmm, I actually think American debt is a good think as far as the big picture is concerned. Americans are the poorest people in the world when you consider the average amount owed.

But all that credit is where much of the economy's size is. If you ahve 100 dollars but have access to 100 dollars of credit for the economy's purposes there is 200 dollars circulating.

Since the debt is internal (most Americans owe Americans) it's really just a big neat "virtual" economy. It hurts the small guy to pay an American corporation his hard earned money but the money eventually goes back into the circulation.
 

Very liberal of you Craven, and the view of the GOP - so who is the conservatives?
 
 
Bill,

I think when you reference "backstabbing" you reference the single most important aspect that makes the Dem's job hard. The lack of a clear favorite to forward as a candidate.

I too don't think the Dems need an issue-based platform just yet and in fact I think running as opposition is a sound one.

But they need a coherent voice and they need to 'celebritize' a candidate.

I see that as being difficult for them. They need a charismatic persona nd they need to give that person name recognition. Right now there is time to do so but time is ticking.
 
 
The Center keeps being referred to as though it were a definite entity - standing there ready to be defined and looked at. But what and where is the center? There are, from growing evidence, many,many dems out there who do not consider themselves center or left. Mostly, what they are is mad. And that s what is happening. Democrats are beginning to be revved up, and the faint oulines of a party program are first making themselves known. I don't know who will get the democratic nod, but I know it won't be Lieberman, because his terribly worked at centrist picture isn't working. And it won't be Kucinich, because he's a little much. But whoever it is will certainly take a cue from Dean, who recognized, tapped into, and channeled the real anger he saw out there. And the anger is real. It's gone far away from Florida, and into everyday life.

Timber, you say the economy is improving, and then you have some figures and statistics to back it up. But a country's economy depends upon its middle class, and, more than that, a productively engaged middle class. That's why the job picture is more important than ever. Loss of jobs means loss of income, which means an eventual housing crisis (and some states have begun to worry about that). It means that the need for aid for food domestically rises, and already some of the food distribution centers across the states are reporting shortages. In other words, you can present figures that show productivity is up, but quite often that translates to the cutting of costs, which invariably means labor. They announced today that another 90,000 plus jobs were gone in August. And none of the lost jobs have been replaced. And applications for jobless benefits have risen sharply this past month. Now you may think the Bush economy is doing well, but a lot of the ordinary people I know don't. Ad I hear a lot of money talk: enough members of the family work in that field, and they are not sanguine about what's coming.

It's the easy way out to say the democrats have no leadership - look what's beginning to happen. No repub likes to talk about it, but there's a reason Dean has caught on with millions of people. And now Kerry. No plans, no programs? Perhaps you've been listening to the wrong democrats.

So far as criticism - well. That's how it goes. Seems to me that for eight years we dems were subjected to an awful lot of terrible things said about us. Repubs dished it out; they should be man enough to take it.

And the biggest thing of all? It's what Bush has done to the American image. We are laughed at, made fun of, not obeyed, sometimes not even listened to. The president is the butt of too many jokes and cartoons world-wide, and they aren't friendly. But we caused that to happen from the beginning, by saying the UN was irrelevant, by backing out of treaties and agreements, by making it very plain that we were able to and going to do all this alone. And that hasn't worked at all.

What's done is done. We haven't seen any signs of a plan from the repubs. Simply saying "I have a plan" doesn't make it so. I have no idea what the admin plans on creating jobs, beyond them saying so. No leadership there that I can see.
 
 
The "meat" is when the repubs actually begin to increase jobs as they've promised for the past three years, instead of the over three million lost jobs. Increase in jobs actually means creating jobs that adds to the three million jobs lost. It doesn't mean starting from zero, today. That's what I call "meat."
 
 
Craven, Labor Day is politically referred to as the beginning of the season, time is ticking - yes, but the season is 5 days old.

Coherent, the Dems have never been coherent until the convention. Right now, as I said before - the worst thing that can happen to them is Clark, Nader running as an Independent/Green and a division such as the Gore/Bradley division. These hard, shoe stomping times don't happen until Primaries start.

The GOP/media would love to try and get them started now! If the Dems go against Bush as a failure and go against each other on issues - Bush is lost. The mantra:

BUSH IS A FAILURE, poor poor GOP!
 
 
I did not know that about labor day. Thanks.

I don't think the Dems have a lost cause, just a tough job. This can all change if they manage to "celebritize" a candidate. They need to work on "brand awareness" right now.
 
 
I knew of it during the actual campaign, ie, next year. But just found out about it from Diane Rheims on her show today. She mentioned that she considers September 1 to be the first day of the 'new year'. I took that as 'politically speaking' - linked with Labor Day next year being the beginning of the season and the debates just started, I linked them. Maybe wrong.

I don't fully agree with the "celebritize" a candidate a candidate right now. If they pick the wrong one out of 10 - oops! Wait until March when the winner will be known - if you peak too early, bye bye! Many consider Gore peaked to early, at the time thought he was holding the heavy stuff in check.........
 
 
Timber
I would hope that you are correct in your thinking. However it goes against conventional wisdom. The recovery is predicted to be a jobless in the short and even the medium term. Many of the lost manufacturing jobs no longer exist and productivity gains are eating into the rest. In addition to manufacturing back office and technical positions are also going off shore.
We simply cannot compete with low wage nations.

Jobless rate falls to 6.1 pct. in August
Posted: Friday, September 5, 10:09am EDT

The civilian unemployment rate improved marginally last month - sliding to 6.1 percent - as companies slashed payrolls by 93,000. Friday's report sent mixed signals about the nation's overall economic health. August was the seventh consecutive month of cuts in payrolls, a survey released by the Labor Department showed, indicating continuing weakness in the job market. But the overall seasonally adjusted unemployment rate fell from 6.2 percent to 6.1 percent of the labor force, as reflected by a survey of US households. The survey of businesses showed that job cuts were heavy again in manufacturing, a sector that has suffered the brunt of the economic downturn that began in March 2001. President Bush on Monday announced that a Commerce Department assistant secretary post was being changed to focus on revitalizing that part of the economy. Friday's reports no longer reflected a cyclical economy trying to add jobs after a recession. Analysts had expected companies to add some jobs last month. Deeper concerns now are focused on long-term structural problems in the economy, such as a flood of US jobs going overseas. Some reports estimate 5 million jobs - many high-paying - will be lost to other countries by 2015. The economy is growing, but demand is being filled from overseas. Also, because of that increasing global competition, businesses are holding down costs by not hiring.
 
 
93,000 more jobs lost in August -

The 2nd quarter recovery was military spending, Government sponsored. Take the away and it was a weak growth quarter.

It has been pointed out that Bush is the largest new spending President in American history - sorry, it doesn't matter that it is all military.

When compared, Bush expenditure for bombs to be exploded in Iraq to destroy infrastructure that we then pay to rebuild vs. Dems - rebuild an electric infrustructure in America, jobs at home, medical care for Americans, food for Americans, education for Americans - turn the economy over, new capitalization that creates more capitalization. Well, it is easy for me to see what is better.
 
 
The insurance companies in Hartford, my home state of Connecticut, are moving their computer operations to India, hundreds of jobs have been lost this year alone.
 
 
I work for the government on a large project that is being implemented. We have a large number of foreigners, mostly Indians, working on this project. They were hired because there aren't enough available qualified................ohhhhhh, nevermind..................
 
 
 
rebuild an electric infrustructure in America, jobs at home, medical care for Americans, food for Americans, education for Americans - turn the economy over, new capitalization that creates more capitalization.
 
That sounds pretty much like the Republican Platform... although there would be a bit in there about National Security as well. As far as The Economy goes, I'm putting my money where my mouth is. Since mid-to-late '99, I've been primarilly a "Short Seller", and I've done very little buy-and-hold acquisition... except for snapping up some IBM last fall when it troughed to $55(wish I'd gotten more... but what the heck). Dollar-Cost-Averaging is lookin' pretty good right now, making a lot of the bargains out there very attractive as long-term position additions. I've been doing a lot of buying the past couple months, and very little Short Selling. In fact, I've been burned on a couple short positions in stocks that had previously been consistent Short-Sell profit-makers. Its my feeling that "The Next Boom" has started, and now is the time to move on it. By the end of the year, the Bull Market Bandwagon is gonna be packed.
 
 
Hey, Bill... the curtailment of the H1-B visa program is gonna put a big dent in "Foreign Hires"
 
 
The "Homeland Security" part has for the most part been pushed out to the States and locals to fund. But, there has been a minor amount of new expenditure - mostly to reorganize 11   agencies and create 1 new agency and one new cabinet level Department.
 
 
H1-B   don't know much about it - I figure a lot of the personnel here are hold overs from the good old Clinton years   I know some are.
 
 
timber, As of yesterday, our investment accounts are ahead by 95 g's. Last year, when the average investor lost 30 percent, we were actually ahead 4.5 percent. I don't 'play' the market like you do; don't need to.  
 
 
Anotehr thing that the immigration rule tightening affected is higher education. International students pay through the nose at most state school, and must pay up front! Since the beginning of the Spring 2002 term, fewer foreign students have enrolled in US universities.
UMBC, (the finest research university with "County" in its name) had for years run a program for maths and sciences teachers in Egypt, where they came to the school for a semester to learn how to integrate technology into their classrooms. This was an infusion of cash for the University System of MD, a win-win situation. After 11th September, the government interened the students for a month, making them fail to complete the problem. It also held up visas for students for the Spring 2002 session,and the following academic year that UMBC cancelled the program. HTis hurts many people on many levels. The USM needed that money for its budget growth (similar programs in Bio at College Park, and Social Sciences at Towson suffered the same fate). The Egyptian teachers lost a great source of education,and,as always, this has negatively effected public opinion about the US in the Middle East.
 
 
hobit, I'm afraid public opinion of the US in the Middle East has been deteriorating for a longer time period. The US support of Israel is one of the reasons.
 
 
 India's take on the H1B cutbacks 

 And a differing view, from BusinessWeek 
 
 
Many "Help Desk" functions have been moved to India - no visa required. There are special English courses taught to recognize questions and answer. If you go outside of that parameters, you get no help!
 
 
That's a brilliant way to increase science teachers when the shortages are so acute.  
 
 
What about English teachers  
 
 
A lot of IT jobs have moved to The Phillipines, too. I expect there will be even more moves toward legislation to disincentivize "Outsourcing" introduced this fall.
 
 
Two most recent signs of the corruption inherent in this regime:

---  Voting Machine Controversy  :

 
Columbus - The head of [Diebold, Inc.], a company vying to sell voting machines in Ohio told Republicans in a recent fund-raising letter that he is "committed to helping Ohio deliver its electoral votes to the president next year."
 

---  bin Laden Relatives, Associates Flown from US in wake of 9/11:  :

 
Americans who want to understand an important aspect of what has gone wrong with the Bush "war on terrorism" must read Craig Unger's stunning investigative story in the October issue of Vanity Fair. He provides a definitive account of how members of the bin Laden family and relatives of the House of Saud were spirited out of the country on private aircraft during the days following the Sept. 11 attacks -- when almost all aviation was prohibited.
 

Now, if I were a different kind of Texan, I might be inclined to super-size my Freedom Fries, buy a "Bush Country" T-Shirt with the red states colored in, plant a "I support our troops and Bush/Cheney" sign in the front yard, put in a Toby Keith CD, crank up the volume, and recite the wisdom of Britney Spears vis-a-vis trusting "the president in everything he does".

But instead I will continue to expose the hypocrisy.

Hey, somebody's gotta do it.
 
 
PDid, Ain't it some'n when this administration does everything in broad daylight, and nary a complaint from the "party?" May all their souls go straight to hell, with a detour to Iraq.
 
 
And you're doing a fine job as usual, PDiddie.
I read the Craig Unger article and was dumbfounded as to how this is all being shuffled under the rug by so many journalist -- the righties on FOX are certainly going to avoid it like the plague. It really is business as usual in Washington despite Dubya's claim that he is not a Washington insider. He is now. It doesn't take long for the machinery to claim someone like Bush as just another cog in the grinding wheel of political machinations. I don't believe he sincerely wanted us to believe he was going their to do things any differently than before. It's a fools game and requires a fool to run things.
 
 
Not a Washington insider - the culprit behind Willie Horton. GWB is, was and always will be a scumbag insider.

"Fair and Balanced"
 
 
Craven, The money for the 32" flat screen TV (which I actually don't have and which,thank god, isn't on my Visa card!) doesn't go to Americans. Not really. Nor the money paid for my actual new Honda. There are an awful lot of goods (and now services) which we get which may appear to be American sourced, but they ain't.
 
 
Tartarin, if that 32" TV is a Sony, it, just like your Honda, was probably built in the US... Sony and Honda both have major production facillities here... its cheaper to build 'em here in the volume required than to ship enough to satisfy the market.
 
 
Tartar, In the current world marketplace, your Honda was assembled in the US. Honda employs 17,000 American workers in their plants in the US. Many US conglomerates also own companies in Japan that employs Japanese workers. Here's a link from the WSJ about Honda plants in the US.
 http://www.wsjclassroomedition.com/archive/03jan/AUTO.htm 
 
 
Just fifnshed watchin NOW with Bill Moyers, on the exploitation of women in the global economy. Scary stuff. I'm about to start reading (tomorrow) Amy Chua's World On Fire.
 
 
True enough. But keep following the money trail and you'll see what I mean.
 
 
aquiunk accuses the Bush Administration of being "atavistic" in their attempts to erase the "New Deal".
I am very much afraid that I recognize the word "atavistic" to mean reverting to an earlier type.

I do believe that the word 'atavistic" denotes a pejorative to most people.

If so, the invasion of Nazi Germany and the administration of the Allies after World War II could be viewed as "atavistic".

I do not think many would consider the political changes carried out in West Germany after World War II to have been largely negative.

Then why would the George Bush administration's "Atavistic" attempts to change the New Deal be viewed as negative?

Some may even look at these changes as positive.
 
 
Italgo,

Sure, some may, and others may not. Your sarcasm did nothing to address either.

Do you view it as positive? If so, why?

Tartarin,

I think I might have been unclear. I did not mean to imply that the credit Americans have goes strictly to American-made products.

My point is that credit adds circulating currency to the American economy. What it's used for is a whole different matter. Credict card debt is what you referenced. Credit card debt goes toward the credit card issuer, which is usually American.
 
 
And Craven, to add to the complications, overseas banks and other companies own a goodly portion of our debt... get the interest payments. In a diverse and globalized economy, the largest personal debt is in America. That means we sure don't want to alienate our creditors. And think how much of the now globalized economy depends on the American consumer to maintain a) our continuing personal debt and b) our continuing ability to pay the debt plus interest.

A lot of us were horrified when a Bush response to 9/11 was "keep spending." Just ol' cogs on the wheel of fortune...
 
 
Tartar, I really had to smile when you mentioned GWBush on a topic that has been boiling for many decades. Bush's "keep spending" statement needs to be put into it's proper perspective. He can't be blamed for the average household debt of Americans that have been accumulating for the past many decades. The American motto, "I want it now" has been in our vocabulary for a long time.
 
 
You're right, of course, CI. The habit was ingrained. As with so many other American habits (the dependency on the quick visual image, the media), Bush exploited it shamelessly.
 
 
President's Iraq
policy a shambles

"Never explain, never complain," Henry Ford 2nd, the original's grandson, said after wrecking a car that was not a Ford, accompanied by a lovely woman who was not his wife. This mantra, not original with Ford, could be the motto of the Bush administration. It has veered from one policy to another, changed direction on a dime, said one thing and done another - all without complaining or explaining.
Particularly on foreign policy, President Bush has been all over the place. During the presidential campaign, he denigrated nation building - he would do no such thing. Now we are up to our eyeballs in building a nation in Iraq.

Bush and company disparaged the UN. Now we seek its imprimatur. The administration told our European allies - the "Old" Europe of Defense Secretary Donald Rumsfeld's scorn - to kiss off. Now we'd like their troops and money.

Pragmatism and politics go hand in hand. Presidents, like parents, lovers and pension managers, sometimes break promises. But Bush is different. Above all, he was incurious, unquestioning and - as we have learned - unprepared. Always, though, he was certain.

That certainty was certainly misplaced. Bush's foreign policy has been a shambles - a war against the wrong enemy (Iraq and not worldwide terrorism), for the wrong reasons (where are those weapons of mass destruction?), a debacle in postwar Iraq (who are those terrorists?), a Middle East road map to nowhere (wasn't Iraq going to make it all so easy?) and a string of statements about nearly everything (the cost of rebuilding Iraq, for instance) that have proved untrue or just plain dumb. To make matters worse, truth tellers have been punished while liars and fog merchants have remained in office.

For Bush, the danger is that this sorry record will revive the cartoon persona of a dummy - not the steady custodian of our national security, as he seemed in the aftermath of 9/11, but a man without judgment, a naif who was manipulated by a cadre of hawks. For the rest of us, the danger is that the caricature was spot on, so obvious it was disregarded.

America is not a particularly ideological country. We simply like the job done, and pragmatism is generally admired. But foreign affairs is not Tom Edison's laboratory - if this won't work, maybe that will - but an area where lives are lost and nations suffer. It is not a field for amateurs or zealots - and the Bush administration is proving itself to have a surplus of both.

Bush won last time out because Al Gore lost. He won at a time when the world seemed safe, when it was unimaginable that the World Trade Center would become a hole in the ground. He won because he seemed the more genuine man, an aw-shucks guy we could take a chance on. We took the chance.

But these recent changes in course - the dash to the UN, the revised costs of rebuilding Iraq - may represent Bush's last chance.

In diplomacy, in foreign affairs, in the waging of war and, maybe, in protecting America, he has made mistake after mistake.

Like Henry Ford 2nd, he may never complain and he may never explain. But when you look back, there's still a wreck in the road.
 
 
and that wreck on the road is a 100 percent write off.
 
 
Dear Craven:

Aquiunk writes:

The underlying aim of Bush Sr. and Bush Jr. is to undo the New Deal.

Interesting but needs proof.

That is why I wrote my post about "atavistic"

Acquiunk proves nothing with his statement.

When I wrote the statement, Clinton raped Juanita Broadderick, I was jeered and told- "You can't say that, there's no proof"

Correct, but more proof than,

Bush Sr. and Bush Jr. aim to undo the New Deal.

Now, if acquiunk could offer proof, I would be happy to listen.
 
 
At the beginning of this post, AU1929 asked _ What has Bush accomplished.

I submit that Bush has accomplished the following:

Leading the Republican Party to a great victory in November 2002 when. contrary to all tradition in mid term elections, the party in power(the Presidency) gained seats in both the House and the Senate.

It is important to point out that President Clinton was excoriated by some on the left for losing the House and the Senate in 1994, 1996 and 1998.
 
 
Italgato
The question was what did he accomplish as president for the good of the nation not for the enhancement of his political party. That seems to be the disease of our national leadership. They are more interested in political gain than the lives and welfare of those they allegedly represent.
 
 
Clinton, always Clinton. What would you do without him? And why is this staement important?

"It is important to point out that President Clinton was excoriated by some on the left for losing the House and the Senate in 1994, 1996 and 1998."

If the Texas republicans are looked at as an example of exemplary behavior, the country's really sliding backward.
 
 
If the Texas Democrats hade a popular mandate, they wouldn't have to play keepaway to stay in the game. If avoiding debate and process is exemplary behavior, then a three-year-old's pouting tantrums are eloquent discourse.
 
 
Not quite accurate, timber. Redistricting takes place every ten years after the census. The Texas republicans, under the push of DeLay and Rove, made clear statements on why they were pushing for redistricting. To get the republicans more Texas seats, and thus give Delay the position he wants. This is stated over and over.

The democrats, with a majority, already have a mandate, so why else do the republicans want to change that? Why else do they want to change the voting rules? From what I'm reading in the Texas papers, seems like a number of ordinary voters are smart enough to see that, and to see that they're the ones who'll get cheated.

Remember the song "The Eyes of Texas are upon you?" Well, it seems to have switched to the eyes upon Texas. and there's not so much about democratic pouting as there is about republican bull-headedness and determination to get its own way at whatever cost. That is not exemplary.

I was in California when Bill Simon got soundly defeated. It wasn't so much Davis cooked the books (if, indeed he did) as Simon never stood a chance. He appealed to very few. And the WH made a mistake. And I was with a bunch of republican workers and fundraisers, who deplored the whole thing.
 
 
 
If the Texas Democrats hade a popular mandate, they wouldn't have to play keepaway to stay in the game. If avoiding debate and process is exemplary behavior, then a three-year-old's pouting tantrums are eloquent discourse.
 

This is an uninformed comment.

If you care to, educate yourself on the topic by reading this thread:

 TX redistricting etc. 
 
 
As one who lives here can tell you, in most parts of Texas people like their local community to be run by Republicans and their national reps to be Dems. As someone who's a relative newcomer (15 years), I'm beginning to understand why. Texans, like many Americans like stability and predictability at home and progress and prosperity out in the larger world. It has affected my own political choices: I'd vote for status quo locally (it's a stable mix) but would never vote for the kind of militarism, alienation and out-of-control spending the Republicans indulge when they get their mitts on national offices.
 
 
I would submit, MJ, that the census results call to question the validity of the mandate claimed by the Texas Democrats... precisely why there is Constitutional provision for redistricting. I wouldn't expect the party required to surrender power to be happy about that, but they should participate in the process or relenquish any claim to legitimacy whatsoever. I see the Democrats, in Texas, other states, and Washington as well, as bullheaded, obstructionist, revisionist, and reactionary determined to get their own way despite the overall will of the greater populace.
As to California, their state constitution provides for legislation by referendum... by and large, the voters of California created their own mess. And I would submit that while Simon was not broadly endorsed by the electorate, Davis' campaign technique obscured the issues (Simon largely played into that, to his own discredit - and to their discredit, the California voters went right along with the game), and now Davis, and California, is paying for that bit of idiocy.
 
 
Timber - you trying to have this two or three ways at once? Could you please clarify your first sentence? What census results (two years after the fact) called into question the validity of the Texas democrat majority? What were these census results?

Caliornia has always been a fascinating state. But then so has mine. I have suspected that one of the reasons the repubs ran Simon to start with (no qualifications) was on the strength of his connections. His father, after all,has some influence, and is and has been a big donor to the party. And how they would love to get California.

And for a small digression - interesting how Bush, for the second time in two years, has not seen fit to come the site of 9/11, when he wraps himself in that date all the time. But the, his absence here was hardly noted.
 
 
 
I would submit, MJ, that the census results call to question the validity of the mandate claimed by the Texas Democrats... precisely why there is Constitutional provision for redistricting. I wouldn't expect the party required to surrender power to be happy about that, but they should participate in the process or relenquish any claim to legitimacy whatsoever. I see the Democrats, in Texas, other states, and Washington as well, as bullheaded, obstructionist, revisionist, and reactionary determined to get their own way despite the overall will of the greater populace.
 

I see you didn't care to open your mind a wee bit.

Your partisan slip is showing.
 
 
And yours isn't, PDiddie?
 
 
Well, shucks, I thought we were all reasonable partisan people here.
 
 
 
 
 
My laundry's been hangin' out since Hector was a pup.
 
 
I believe it is the strategy of the Republican party to do away with the loyal opposition concept and do everything in its power to keep the Democrats from being a viable party. I only hope that when the Democrats get into office they are mean enough to return the favor.
 
 
I am very much afraid that P Diddie and Mamajuana are quite mistaken. If, as they claim, there is something unlawful in the Texas Legislature's Redistricting, I hope they understand that the matter can be taken to the appropriate judicial level to be settled. I hope they know that such a move will not be taken.
The moans about "unethical" and "unfair" have been heard in other venues. The minority Democrats in the Senate have quite successfully blocked several judicial nominations by President Bush.
The Democratic tactic in the Senate was bemoaned by some Republicans, but that tactic, just like the tactic used by the Texas Republicans is assuredly legal.

When the maps are re-drawn, that will insure that five or six more seats will be added to the Republican representatation of Texas in the House of Representatives in DC.

In the meantime, despite all of the Democratic posturing on how the Republicans are failing throughout the country, REALITY is catching up to the left wing.

Hollings is not running again in South Carolina. He knows he would lose to a Republican.

Edwards has signaled that he will not be running again in North Carolina since he is concentrating on the Presidency.

It is a political truism that the Democrats cannot win the Presidency without taking at least a couple of states in the South.

Does anyone know of any they have a chance of taking?
 
 
edgar, I suspect the Democrats need little help from the Republicans in the interest of reducing the viability of their Party... they seem perfectly capable of managing that superbly all by themselves. Perhaps thats the only strength they're playing into.
 
 
Here's the lowdown on the Texas redistricting feud.
Italgato is correct, because it's the state legislative process - all legal.  http://www.washtimes.com/upi-breaking/20030624-050340-6198r.htm 
 
 
Thank You- CI - for an excellent link. I hope everyone interested in the topic of redistricting reads it.
 
 
That article is dated June 24, so it really doesn't reflect much in the way of recent developments.

There's a thread on this topic with about sixty posts since June 25 and it's located  here. 
 
 
PDid, Developments? If it's in the state's legislative process, what has changed? Did they change the laws? If so, how?
 
 
Gotta go with PDiddie here, the thread for discussion of the Texas Two Step is  HERE 
 
 
MoveOn.org has fashioned another banderilla for the flank of America's numero uno bull-shitter. Here's their latest email to members:

 
The President says things that are misleading or just plain wrong every day, but most of these statements are never challenged. That's why we're launching Misleader.org, a new website and free daily email service for journalists and the general public to track George Bush's false statements.

You can sign up right now at:
 http://www.misleader.org/ 

The daily dispatches will take a "Just the Facts, Ma'am" approach -- no rhetoric, just a couple of paragraphs we'll email each morning on what the President said and why it was misleading or untrue. It's our hope that by doing some of the research for the press corps, we can ensure better coverage of President Bush's lies. If you know someone who could use this kind of information, please point him or her to the site.

To launch the site, we've taken out a full page ad in the New York Times titled "Mis-State of the Union." The ad reveals how the President mislead the nation in his State of the Union speech -- not just on Iraq, but on the economy, the environment, and other important issues. You can check the ad out at:
 http://www.misleader.org/pdf/nyt_ad.pdf 

Here are a few juicy tidbits from our New York Times ad:

ON TAX CUTS:
George Bush: "The tax relief is for everyone who pays income taxes...Americans will keep, this year, an average of almost $1,000 more of their own money."
The Truth: Nearly half of all taxpayers get less than $100. And 31% of all taxpayers get nothing at all.

ON JOBS:
George Bush: "Our first goal is...an economy that grows fast enough to employ every man and woman who seeks a job."
The Truth: Bush is the first President since Hoover to preside over an economy that has lost jobs, not created them - more than 2.9 million since 2001.

ON THE ENVIRONMENT:
George Bush: "[My] Clear Skies legislation...mandates a 70% cut in air pollution from power plants over the next 15 years."
The Truth: The Bush plan will allow more than 100,000 additional premature deaths by 2020 than alternative legislation developed by the Environmental Protection Agency. The plan does not regulate carbon emissions and allows far more sulfur and mercury emissions.

ON EDUCATION:
George Bush: "[W]e achieved historic education reform - which must now be carried out in every school and in every classroom."
The Truth: Bush cut $8 billion from the promised funds for education.

If you'd like to receive a daily email with content like this, you can sign up right now at:
 http://www.misleader.org/ 

When Bush was running for President, he said, "I believe everyone should be held responsible for their own personal behavior." We agree. The President has repeatedly mislead the country. Now it's time for Americans and the press to hold him responsible.
 
 
 
Something which comes to mind here, in consideration of the rising rhetoric from The Left, is that the last time that wing showed anywhere near so much hope, outrage, confidence, focus and energy was in 1971-'72. As I recall, the election of '72 was indeed a landslide reaction to their efforts; the Democrats carried one state. And, at the time, their party enjoyed the additional advantage of preponderant legislative incumbency, a point not in their favor this time.
 
 
...and look who got elected!
 
 
Water over the gate, LW, water over the gate  
 
 
Paul Krugman, a Princeton economist, had a long article in this sunday's New York Times Sunday Magazine on the Bush economic and taxing policies. And one of the point he made is that the Bush administration simply and directly lies about it's policies and their effects. He also pointed out in an interview on NPR on Friday that the Times editors would not allow him to use the word "lie" and he has had to resort to euphemisms.
 
 
There is something truly breathtaking in the lying as it is exercised by Bush, Cheney, Rumsfeld, in fact it seems everyone connected to this Cabal.

Tucker Carlson (the tow-headed bow-tied "Crossfire" conservative for those who you who are unfamiliar) reports that Karen Hughes, until last year Counselor to the President, is nearly pathological in her prevarication:

 
Then I heard that [on the campaign bus, Bush communications director] Karen Hughes accused me of lying. And so I called Karen and asked her why she was saying this, and she had this almost Orwellian rap that she laid on me about how things she'd heard -- that I watched her hear -- she in fact had never heard, and she'd never heard Bush use profanity ever. It was insane.

I've obviously been lied to a lot by campaign operatives, but the striking thing about the way she lied was she knew I knew she was lying, and she did it anyway. There is no word in English that captures that. It almost crosses over from bravado into mental illness.
 

 Salon (you'll need to sign in and look at an ad) 
 
 
Timber -- I don't think that's the first time you've cited the 1972 election. It's as well to remind you that we were right about Nixon.

So getting elected doesn't mean being right, or being good, or being a credit to one's nation, or worthy of your persistent defense. Unless (as one has to consider) you kind of relish lyin' and cheatin' if it's done by a conservative!
 
 
The only good Republican President in the last 50 years - Ford, and he wasn't elected. Go figure!!!!!!
 
 
I never liked Nixon myself, Tartarin. I merely point to history, and recognize you do so too. I doubt an exact repeat, that sort of thing rarely happens. However, if Bush the Younger's second term is cut short under cloud of impeachment I'll uncontentiously eat crow however you care to serve it.
 
 
You won't have to timber, he won't even be elected to one term   and the country would never stand for another appointment to unPresident!
 
 
Acquiunk tells us about Paul Krugman. He tells us that Krugman says that the Bush Administration simply lies.

Krugman is a perfect example of an intellectual who is a specialist and highly informed in his area of expertise, wandering into subjects which he really does not understand.

Richard A. Posner, who, anyone who knows anything about law would admit, is far more knowledgeable about legal matters than Krugman, comments in his book "Public Intellectuals", as follows:

quote
P. 102
"Paul Krugman, too, has ventured into commentary on a legal subject...Toward the end of his column Krugman states that Amazon.com's discriminatory preicing of books is "undeniably unfiar; some people pay more just because of who they are, " and, "it looks to me as if the Robinson-Patman Act, which outlaws price discrimination across state lines could be invoked to prevent such discrimination"
end of quote.

Then Posner, the Jurist, replies to Krugman, the economist.

quote P. 102

He( Kurgman) is wrong about the Robinson-Patman Act. If does not outlaw price discrimination.

end of quote.

Krugman is wrong quite often. Especially when he ventures out of his field( economics) and into someone else's speciality( law).

Krugman is ther perfect example of the intellectual who is quite expert in his field concluding that his expertise in one field extends to all others( eg. Politics).
 
 
Bill W's posts are fascinating. I don't know if Bill W. has ever read the Guidelines which clearly state that if a posting is just one's Opinion, it is well to say so.

I do not recall Bill W. ever giving any proof or documentation when he posts.

I feel it would strengthen his arguments immensely.

Now, I merely conclude that his posts are based only on his opinion and while his opinions may be fqascinating and interesting at times, they cannot be said to be informed opinions, unless Bill W. has an expertise with which I am unfamililar.
 
 
In this article Krugman was talking about economics, which is his field.
 
 
Dear acquiunk: would you mind posting a link to that article?

I do not think that it is clearly about Economics but rather mainly about Politics. I would like to look at it to see whether it is really all about Economics.

Link please????
 
 
the Great Richard Posner announced today that soft paper was easier on his behind. Posner, who is the expert on everything under the sun, stated that this would be a day when the makers of harsh paper would rue the day they had chapped his baby soft behind. Posner states in paragraph 14 on page 28: "I have a snooth behind. Isn't that great?"  
 
 
 
the Great Richard Posner announced today that soft paper was easier on his behind. Posner, who is the expert on everything under the sun, stated that this would be a day when the makers of harsh paper would rue the day they had chapped his baby soft behind. Posner states in paragraph 14 on page 28: "I have a snooth behind. Isn't that great?"  
 

It's bad enough having to read gato 's posts without the image of Richard Posner wiping his spotty Republican ass. Thanks a lot, hobitbob.  
 
 
anytime.  
 
 
 http://www.nytimes.com/2003/09/14/magazine/14TAXES.html 
 
 
Lets look at just one of the Opposition allegations concerning Bush the Younger: The claim he is "The Dumbest President Ever". That claim does not square well with the facts. Though apparently no hard IQ number for him is available on the 'net, it is a simple matter to track down his SAT score, which was 1206, placing him in the 84th percentile of all college aspirants. That he placed in the top 16% clearly puts him at the upper end of the category. While not designed as an IQ test, there is a strong corrolary between SAT scores and IQ scores; statistically, the 84th percentile corresponds to an IQ of 115 or higher.

 Reference 1   Reference 2   Reference 3 

Oh, and knock off the ass grabbin' again, already.
 
 
timber, I thought all college grads had a IQ of 125 or higher?
 
 
I'll see that Krugman, and raise you a  Krauthammer 

 
What makes the Bush-haters so mad?
 
 
 
 
timber, I thought all college grads had a IQ of 125 or higher?
 

Now c'mon, c.i.... that's preposterous on the face of it. 125 is an average of college graduate scores, not the lower limit. Besides, the SAT/IQ corollary would place 115 as a lower limit, and in no way addresses any question of upper limit. It would be reasonable to extrapolate that as a multiply degreed college graduate, Bush would trend to a higher score. Think about it.
 
 
He's pretty much wasted that fancy Ivy League sheepskin, from what I see.

The man who would be emperor was a "C" student at Yale and proud of it, couldn't make it past 1st Lieutenant in the Air National Guard (and tree moss can be promoted to Captain, as long as it doesn't run away); must have paid someone off to do his MBA work at Harvard since no record of exemplars exists prior, and failed at every business opportunity that was not supported by family, friends, and retainers.

So is this at all surprising for President Dumber-than-Dogshit?

 
President Bush is stressing that the United States has a clear mission in Iraq to fight terrorists and foster democracy there, yet a new poll shows that fewer than half of Americans share his belief.

* * *

"We are following a clear strategy with three objectives: destroy the terrorists, enlist international support for a free Iraq and quickly transfer authority to the Iraqi people," Bush said Saturday in his weekly radio address.
 

So let's look at those one at a time:

**"destroy the terrists", uh, no. No sign that's going at all well. Seems the terrists are no only striking at will and getting stronger, but we seem to be helping out their recruiting drive with our outstanding treatment of the Iraqis.

**"enlist international support", nope, another non-starter. Seems the International Confectionary Alliance and now the Japanese are still a bit 'worried' about putting their troops into harm's way for Dubya's war. Imagine that...governments with actual, responsible, adults in charge.

**"quickly transfer authority to the Iraqi People", yeah sure. As long as they are not Shia, Sunni, Kurdish and have the last name of Chalabi. If US forces left today, the Iraqis would probably rip that guy limb from limb within 24 hours. Nothing like a puppet without its puppeteer...that must be how it feels every time he's away from Karl and Unka Dick, right?

Pretty much have to hand out another failing grade. But when your life is one long, sad song in the key of "F", I guess you get inured to the concept.
 
 
Professor Hobitbob:

I really did not think you would attempt to denigrate another scholar as you have done to Judge Posner.

Why don't you do the honorable thing and try to rebut his ideas instead of attacking him as Cyrano was attacked- By a lackey and from behind.

You do demean yourself.
 
 
P. Diddie states that President Bush must have paid someone off to do his MBA work at Harvard.

I wonder if P. Diddie can give a link to support that statement.

Has P. Diddie ever attended the Harvard Business School?

Does he know anyone who has?

Timber pointed out that President Bush had a 1206 SAT and at least a 115 IQ( my correlations show at least 120).

Does P. Diddie know what is involved in passing courses in the MBA Program at HArvard?

Does P. Diddie think that someone took the exams for President Bush?

Does P. Diddie know that Harvard will not put up with cheating no matter who the person is?

Does P. Diddie know that Ted Kennedy was expelled for getting someone to take his Spanish final for him?

Does P. Diddie know that many of the MBA classes at Harvard are structured like Law School classes where the professor calls on the individual student to discuss the previous night's readings?

Does P. Diddie know that some of the MBA classes are structured so that individuals must solve a particular broad based problem, report on it in class and answer myriad questions concerning the reports?
 
 
Re: The Failed Presidency.

 
Would you consider the Bush presidency a "FAILED PRESIDENCY." If so why? Have there been in your opinion any successes?
 

I saw the title for this discussion, and I thought, "Aren't people tired of discussing the Clinton administration?" (Boy is my face red.) :wink:

But seriously, no, I wouldn't call Dubya's a failed Presidency, nor would I call it a home run. I'm disappointed in a lot of his decisions--pretty much all of them designed to woo those on the left who obviously (obvious to me, at least) are absolutely unwilling to be wooed. Bush ran as a conservative and is governing as a moderate. I didn't intend to elect a moderate.
 
 
Re: The Failed Presidency.

 
Bush ran as a conservative and is governing as a moderate. I didn't intend to elect a moderate.
 

Would you mind going into a bit more detail about how Bush has failed you?

Another way of asking it might be, 'what are some of the moderate positions Bush has taken that have left you feeling let down'?
 
 
Re: The Failed Presidency.

 
 
Bush ran as a conservative and is governing as a moderate. I didn't intend to elect a moderate.
 

Would you mind going into a bit more detail about how Bush has failed you?

Another way of asking it might be, 'what are some of the moderate positions Bush has taken that have left you feeling let down'?
 

Glad to. For starters, he handed the teachers' union and the Democrats the largest expansion in the federal education bureaucracy in history, even letting Ted Kennedy pen much of the legislation. Then there are the steel tariffs... another bone to a dog that won't ever hunt for Bush. That's two off the top of my head, I'd give it some thought and give you more, but I have a meeting starting in ten minutes.
 
 
It is difficult, from the traditional conservative perspective, to accept or condone the growth of government Bush the Younger has fostered... how Democratic of him. IMO, while in some part and paticular justified, even prudent, his overall spending record displays a profligacy that is untoward to say the least, though there blame must be shared with the legislators who pass, and pad, the proposed legislation. Not to single out this administration by any means; pork is the staple diet of those within the confines of The Beltway.
 
 
 
It is difficult, from the traditional conservative perspective, to accept or condone the growth of government Bush the Younger has fostered... how Democratic of him. IMO, while in some part and paticular justified, even prudent, his overall spending record displays a profligacy that is untoward to say the least, though there blame must be shared with the legislators who pass, and pad, the proposed legislation. Not to single out this administration by any means; pork is the staple diet of those within the confines of The Beltway.
 

Of course. And I'm not writing that I don't understand it, just that I am not pleased. When Bush was elected, I saw an opportunity for Republicans to rally and work towards implementing a real, concrete conservative platform--reduce taxes and government, expand freedom and opportunity, reinstate the Constitution as the blueprint of our system of government--let Americans live with the results and then decide whether they are better or worse off than before. That's how you lead. That's how leaders govern. A number of people here in A2K have made a mantra of calling me a "Bushie", but the reality is that Bush to me has never been more than a better alternative to anything the liberals have to offer.

One could rewrite the quotation from my signature, below, thusly:

"Gore would have run towards socialism while Bush is content to walk there." Either way you'll find me kicking and screaming and pulling in the other direction, but at least with Bush I'm not being dragged quite so quickly. :wink:
 
 
I gotta say I find it amusing that some ascribe to me a love of Bush (something I've clearly not evidenced, IMO) merely because I hold to ridicule the preposterous, confiscatory, unconstitutional notions of governance espoused by those of the leftist persuasion. Fortunately for those of that leaning, I'm a Responsible gun owner  
 
 
What do you propose to do about the irresponsible gun owners, we seem to have a number of them around here (Connecticut).
 
 
I propose we dress them in deerskin clothing and release them on Ted Nugent's hunting ranch in Michigan.
 
 
Not bad. If it doesn't work, dress 'em up as cows.
 
 
A couple years ago near here, a fellow, a city-dweller on his first hunt, shot a domesticated llama he had mistaken for any other 8-foot tall, black-and-white deer. Some local dairymen, in whimsy I'm sure, emblazon in International Orange spraypaint, the word "COW" on the flanks of their stock. Dunno if it does any good.
 
 
Well, at least llamas are tasty. Mean critters too.
 
 
Yeah, they do cook up good. The only saving grace is that the inappropriately deceased llama indeed was a meat critter, not a pet.
 
 
 
Lets look at just one of the Opposition allegations concerning Bush the Younger: The claim he is "The Dumbest President Ever". That claim does not square well with the facts. Though apparently no hard IQ number for him is available on the 'net, it is a simple matter to track down his SAT score, which was 1206, placing him in the 84th percentile of all college aspirants. That he placed in the top 16% clearly puts him at the upper end of the category. While not designed as an IQ test, there is a strong corrolary between SAT scores and IQ scores; statistically, the 84th percentile corresponds to an IQ of 115 or higher.

 Reference 1   Reference 2   Reference 3 

Oh, and knock off the ass grabbin' again, already.
 

Could be that he scored that high honestly -- or it could be that there is another explanation.

I would prefer not to use test scores to judge Bush's intelligence, unless I personally monitored him taking the test. I prefer to listen to what the guy has to say -- and use what he says to judge whether or not he is intelligent.

Here are a few examples:

"Rarely is the question asked: Is our children learning?"-Florence, S.C., Jan. 11, 2000

"The important question is, How many hands have I shaked?"-Answering a question about why he hasn't spent more time in New Hampshire, in the New York Times, Oct. 23, 1999

"Will the highways on the Internet become more few?"-Concord, N.H., Jan. 29, 2000

"That's a chapter, the last chapter of the 20th, 20th, the 21st century that most of us would rather forget. The last chapter of the 20th century. This is the first chapter of the 21st century. "
Arlington Heights, Ill., Oct. 24, 2000

"We must all hear the universal call to like your neighbor like you like to be liked yourself."

"I understand small business growth. I was one."
New York Daily News, Feb. 19, 2000

"States should have the right to enact reasonable laws and restrictions particularly to end the inhumane practice of ending a life that otherwise could live."
Cleveland, June 29, 2000

"I think we agree, the past is over."
On his meeting with John McCain, Dallas Morning News, May 10, 2000

"I don't have to accept their tenants. I was trying to convince those college students to accept my tenants. And I reject any labeling me because I happened to go to the university."
Today, Feb. 23, 2000

"The senator has got to understand if he's going to have, he can't have it both ways. He can't take the high horse and then claim the low road."
To reporters in Florence, S.C., Feb. 17, 2000

"How do you know if you don't measure if you have a system that simply suckles kids through?"
Explaining the need for educational accountability in Beaufort, S.C., Feb. 16, 2000

"I do not agree with this notion that somehow if I go to try to attract votes and to lead people toward a better tomorrow somehow I get subscribed to some, some doctrine gets subscribed to me."
Meet The Press, Feb. 13, 2000

"It was just inebriating what Midland was all about then."
From a 1994 interview, as quoted in First Son, by Bill Minutaglio

"Keep good relations with the Grecians."
Quoted in the Economist, June 12, 1999

"This is Preservation Month. I appreciate preservation. It's what you do when you run for president. You gotta preserve." -George W. Bush, speaking during "Perseverance Month" at Fairgrounds Elementary School in Nashua, New Hampshire, Jan. 28, 2000

"Laura and I really don't realize how bright our children is sometimes until we get an objective analysis." -George W. Bush, CNBC, April 15, 2000

I've got dozens more, Timber, but I'll spare you for now.

The man is a moron.

I know I'm an agnotic, but I gota tell ya...

...there is absolutely no way this guy ever legitimately scored in the 84th percentile on an intelligence test of any kind any time in his life.

I doubt I will convince you -- but think about it. How could a guy score that high in comparative intelligence and say any of these things?

He is a moron.
 
 
I dunno, Frank... he's a powerful, successful moron if so, rather an oxymoron, if ya ask me. He does provide quotes on the order of the emminently memorable spoutings of the late Richard J. Daley, though, don't he? God, I love my Little Green Book... "The poloice are here to preserve disorder, not create disorder" ahhhh, ya gotta love that sort of loquatiousness in a politician, whatever his stripe.
 
 
 
I dunno, Frank... he's a powerful, successful moron if so...
 

Yes, he is, Timber. He is indeed. Both a moron and a powerful, successful one at that.

 
...rather an oxymoron, if ya ask me.
 

Nah, not at all. A bit baffling perhaps -- unless you take into consideration his connections.

 
He does provide quotes on the order of the emminently memorable spoutings of the late Richard J. Daley, though, don't he? God, I love my Little Green Book... "The poloice are here to preserve disorder, not create disorder" ahhhh, ya gotta love that sort of loquatiousness in a politician, whatever his stripe.
 

Another very powerful, successful moron.
 
 
Baffling pretty much says it, Frank. One of life's mysteries, fer sure.
 
 
 
I dunno, Frank... he's a powerful, successful moron if so, rather an oxymoron, if ya ask me. He does provide quotes on the order of the emminently memorable spoutings of the late Richard J. Daley, though, don't he? God, I love my Little Green Book... "The poloice are here to preserve disorder, not create disorder" ahhhh, ya gotta love that sort of loquatiousness in a politician, whatever his stripe.
 

Other Richard J. Daley quotations:

"I resent insinuendoes."

"We shall reach greater and greater platitudes of achievement."

On introducing Carl Sandburg: "We are proud to have with us the poet lariat of Chicago."

"They have vilified me, they have crucified me; yes, they have even criticized me."

"Robert's Rules of Order is the greatest book ever written."

"Look at our Lord's disciples. One denied Him; one doubted Him; one betrayed Him. If our Lord couldn't have perfection, how are you going to have it in city government?"

Daley was no Einstein, that's for sure, and he could mangle the English language into such an unrecognizable pulp that even Yogi Berra would be left scratching his head in bewilderment. But he was without question a political genius.
 
 
AFLAC!
 
 
 
 
I dunno, Frank... he's a powerful, successful moron if so, rather an oxymoron, if ya ask me. He does provide quotes on the order of the emminently memorable spoutings of the late Richard J. Daley, though, don't he? God, I love my Little Green Book... "The poloice are here to preserve disorder, not create disorder" ahhhh, ya gotta love that sort of loquatiousness in a politician, whatever his stripe.
 

Other Richard J. Daley quotations:

"I resent insinuendoes."

"We shall reach greater and greater platitudes of achievement."

On introducing Carl Sandburg: "We are proud to have with us the poet lariat of Chicago."

"They have vilified me, they have crucified me; yes, they have even criticized me."

"Robert's Rules of Order is the greatest book ever written."

"Look at our Lord's disciples. One denied Him; one doubted Him; one betrayed Him. If our Lord couldn't have perfection, how are you going to have it in city government?"

Daley was no Einstein, that's for sure, and he could mangle the English language into such an unrecognizable pulp that even Yogi Berra would be left scratching his head in bewilderment. But he was without question a political genius.
 

Daley was a crook -- a charlatan -- and an elected leader who was out of control. He thought his decisions were sacrosanct -- and arbitrarily decided what could and could not be in Chicago.

He was a very, very, very dangerous moron.

Ahhh...so is Dubya.

Thanks for making the comparison.

I truly would have thought you would avoid that kind of thing -- but apparently you are a fair man.
 
 
Fairness calls for recognition where it is due... Daley, Bush, Mao... all had their successesses, and all have had their impact... much which yet is ongoing, not fully realized, and likely of ususpected, unintended, nature.
 
 
Part of an interview with George and Laura Bush, conducted by Peggy Noonan, which appears in the current print edition of Ladies Home Journal:

 
Peggy Noonan (the interviewer): You were separated on September 11th. What was it like when you saw each other again?

Laura Bush: Well, we just hugged. I think there was a certain amount of security in being with each other than being apart.

George W. Bush: But the day ended on a relatively humorous note. The agents said, "you'll be sleeping downstairs. Washington's still a dangerous place." And I said no, I can't sleep down there, the bed didn't look comfortable. I was really tired, Laura was tired, we like our own bed. We like our own routine. You know, kind of a nester. I knew I had to deal with the issue the next day and provide strength and comfort to the country, and so I needed rest in order to be mentally prepared. So I told the agent we're going upstairs, and he reluctantly said okay. Laura wears contacts, and she was sound asleep. Barney was there. And the agent comes running up and says, "We're under attack. We need you downstairs," and so there we go. I'm in my running shorts and my T-shirt, and I'm barefooted. Got the dog in one hand, Laura had a cat, I'm holding Laura --

Laura Bush: I don't have my contacts in, and I'm in my fuzzy house slippers --

George W. Bush: And this guy's out of breath, and we're heading straight down to the basement because there's an incoming unidentified airplane, which is coming toward the White House. Then the guy says it's a friendly airplane. And we hustle all the way back up stairs and go to bed.

Mrs. Bush: [LAUGHS] And we just lay there thinking about the way we must have looked.

Peggy Noonan (interviewer): So the day starts in tragedy and ends in Marx Brothers.

George W. Bush: That's right--we got a laugh out of it.
 

The important thing is, you know, that the day ended on a happy note.  
 
 
He hit the trifecta!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
 
 
On occasions like those (I mean it -- it's one of my hugest moral failings) I'm always most concerned about the dogs and cats (and colts etc.). Whatsa coupla brainless humans, after all, in the great scheme...!
 
 
When I asked Diddie whether he knew what the Harvard MBA program was like, he did not answer. I can only assume he did not know.

However, despite my partial description of the program which George W. Bush successfully completed(lest you think that Harvard is easy or corruptble, you are reminded that Ted Kennedy was summarily expelled for cheating on a Spanish Test), I find that some posters, giving no evidence at all, have dubbed president Bush a "moron".

I can understand partisanship but the designation "moron" for President Bush simply does not square with any empirical evidence.

FrankAPisa may, of course, go on believing that President Bush is a moron. If it makes Frank APisa feel better, it is all to his benefit, however, empirical evidence shows that Frank A Pisa and any others who would insist that President Bush is a moron are egregiously mistaken.

Evidence?

Bush scored a 1206 on his SAT test.

That correlates with an IQ of around 115-120.

A Moron is defined as one who has an IQ of 50-69.

I can, of course, be persuaded by documented numbers i may not be aware of but, in the absence of those numbers, I must regretfully indicate that the appelation Moron, as applied to George W. Bush, appears to be an outgrowth of sophomoric nonsense.

Evidence is needed when names are given, of course.

Some on the right have taken to calling former President Clinton a Rapist based on his alleged rape of one Juanita Broadderick more than two decades ago.

There is no empirical evidence to prove that Clinton was indeed a rapist and that charge is as ludicrous as the moron charge for Bush.
 
 
 
When I asked Diddie whether he knew what the Harvard MBA program was like, he did not answer. I can only assume he did not know.
 

You should not assume.

However, if you insist on doing so, you should assume that I am not going to read or respond to much of anything you type.  

Now then, for every one who enjoys a chuckle, take a look at Dubya's  Hotmail Inbox.   
 
 
Snope's article on Bush's IQ (tested at 95):

 http://www.snopes2.com/inboxer/hoaxes/presiq.htm 
 
 
95 Isn't that somewhere between moron and I spelled my name correctly.    
 
 
 
When I asked Diddie whether he knew what the Harvard MBA program was like, he did not answer. I can only assume he did not know.
 

Gato, I asked you a question on  another thread  : perhaps you missed it:

 
 
I feel obliged to point out that the following are not "sentiments"( feelings, opinion and/or emotions) but rather facts which can be substantiated.

l. Harvard Business School was considered the best of all Business Schools when President Bush attended.
 

How do you substantiate this claim? Where's your proof?
 

You never answered this question. Can I, then, assume that you don't know the answer?
 
 
 
Snope's article on Bush's IQ (tested at 95):

 http://www.snopes2.com/inboxer/hoaxes/presiq.htm 
 

Didn't read the article all the way, huh?
 
As obvious as this joke was, at least two publications were taken in by it: The [London] Guardian and the New Zealand Southland Times. Both ran the "Presidential I.Q." tale as a factual item (on 19 July and 7 August 2001 respectively). The Associated Press publicized The Guardian's error on 12 August, moving The Guardian to post a retraction on 14 August, and U.S. News & World Report clearly reported the I.Q. item as a hoax on 20 August, 2001.
 
 
 
No, I read it all -- just left it up to anyone to discover that there is no factual material reporting Bush's IQ as bait. I don't really care what his IQ is or that factually he was a Cee student (something he has attested to himself). His leadership and administrative ability, not to mention his poor communication skills, are possibly why one would think him a moron as a politician. His handlers are experts in spin control, not for hiding womanizing but for hiding his ineptness as a leader.
 
 
(Benjamin Franklin was a notorious womanizer).
 
 
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
(
 
Benjamin Franklin was a notorious womanizer).
 

So what?
 
 
Hey, that Doonsbury link doesn't work! ;(
 
 
So, that's not a viable reason to judge anyone's leadership ability.
 
 
I thimk that's the point au  

Apparently, many have decided that a stupid leader (sic) deserves the same conclusion....
 
 
The snopes article is so old that the Doonesbury cartoon is likely no longer archived (they end up in his books). However, since the 95 IQ has never been verified (which doesn't make it fabricated necessarily), I would think this is a non-issue. Those who take SAT tests are not required to take any standardized IQ test and those tests can vary -- a college professor once told me you have to take many tests over a period of years and then average them out.
 
 
BTW, Franklin wasn't the only womanizer and adulterer amongst our forefathers and could drink most of the others under the table.
 
 
 
 
 
Jefferson was a party guy, too. I imagine just his documented extracurricular pursuits would have disqualified him conclusively from the electoral arena of today.
 
 
JFK was no slouch in that department either. Considering the accomplishments of these people maybe it should be a requisite for presidential office.    
 
 
It seems some people must learn to differentiate between job performance and everything else of a personal nature. That's the only logical way to compare apples to apples.
 
 
Jefferson's initiation of the first university in the U.S. (and it was free, mind you) exonerated him in my book from anything including screwing his sheep.
 
 
I understand he only did ewes.

The guy was straight.
 
 
Didn't I see him in a Woody Allen movie?
 
 
Drove into Austin today on one of those days (equinoxal, I guess) when radio reception is very odd. I could get Fort Wayne, IN and Little Rock, but not Austin or San Antonio radio in the car... Someone out there somewhere remarked dolefully, in a discussion of the presidential race, that even the Democrat with the highest numbers is 10% behind Bush, oh woe.

OH WOE???!!! Seems to me that a president with the machinery, money, and war Bush has, 10% ahead of unknown Democrats doesn't look very good to me, ought to make Republicans worry.

At this point in Clinton's presidency -- given Monica etc. -- what percentage was he ahead, in the polls, of Bush and McCain etc.?

Ditto Papa Bush?

Anyone have any numbers to compare?

Talk of the Nation today seemed to have devoted its first hour to Wesley Clark. Only heard a few minutes of it; sounded interesting. Available at npr.org.
 
 
Tartarin, don't even bother to listen to them that has problems. It has really turned into a big joke - the comparisons that is. I don't even think it is a argument unless your boy is better than that being argued  
 
 
I don't have the figures at hand, but Bush's current numbers are not materially different from his predecessor's at the same relative point in his first term, though the slight edge there is goes to Bush in most categories. Polls being what they are, well.... polls are what they are, especially early ones. Suffice it to say the previous incumbent won re-election regardless his position in the polls at this corresponding time.
 
 
 
 

From an interview with Paul Krugman by the blogger  Calpundit. 
 
 
The key players in the "drive to destroy much of what is best in our country" are almost exclusively members of the liberal elite. (Paul Krugman is their poster child.)
 
 
Scrat, go back to bed.
 
 
"Elite: the choice or best part, as of a body or class of persons."

Exactly. And Paul will be pleased too!
 
 
 
Scrat, go back to bed.
 

Sorry, no can do. I have a 2 week old here who insists on turning me into a morning person. Hope you are braced for the storm.  
 
 
 
The key players in the "drive to destroy much of what is best in our country" are almost exclusively members of the liberal elite. (Paul Krugman is their poster child.)
 

Dubya, Ashcroft, Rumsfeld!!!

They are members of the liberal elite???

I don't think so!
 
 
How is it that the conservatives are able to twist things out of kilter by 180 degrees and still think they are making any sense? That really confuses me!
 
 
Savage, Limbaugh, Murdock, Horowitz - need I say more  
 
 
Its all perspective and perception, c.i.... a lot of it is pot-and-kettle stuff. The greatest challenge the Dems face, IMHO, is finding a way to get beyond their negatavism. The current campaign is shaping into a replay of '72, it seems to me. The closeness of the 2000 election, and the clear message sent by the '02 Mid-Term election, were lost on The Democratic Leadership, I believe. Rather than court the center, they are distancing themselves from it, under the banner of differentiating themselves from The Republicans, and I feel they do so to their own disadvantage. I could be wrong of course, after all, its just a matter of perspective and perception.
 
 
Thank goodness we all have opinions - and none are right, or is it, all are right. I guess neocon negatavism is good and lib negatavism is bad - too deep a subject for my little mind!
 
 
Timber
In the end the outcome of the election may boil down to one basic concept.

"It's the economy stupid"
If the economy has bounced back by election time Bush is a shoo in. If not it's a crap shoot
As for negativism Isn't every campaign based in part on negativism. The idea being to denigrate the opponent in every way possible..
 
 
timber, I know it's all "perspective and perception." What makes it hard to understand is that the far right and the far left can't be all right or all wrong, but on primary issues the gap seems rather too large to rationalize. Admittedly, there are greys in most things, but not on issues such as "why this war was justified." How is it that most Americans can switch from one justification to the next without questioning why the justification has changed? That's what I don't understand.
 
 
Again, just a matter of personal opinion, BillW, but I see little of the negativism flying around comming from the conservatives. I suppose some can be found out toward the fringe, but I don't see from The Mainstream Right the shrill, downright nasty disparagement, the invective and ad hominem attack which appear to have become the norm for the liberal camp's campaign. I truly expect The Electorate to react negatively to that approach.
 
 
Good points. au. I agree both in principle and particular. The worst of all possible eventualities for the Democrats would be a clearly recovering, expanding economy. Its a given more folks vote by pocketbook than by conscience.
 
 
Just so you understand, Timber: many of us seriously see Bush as not a fascist but getting very close. So when I read supporters of the status quo writing the rest of us off as "negative," I'm caught between pride and horror. Horror that an American would see fighting nascent fascism and imperialism as "negative," and pride that at least a substantial group of Americans are able to see more clearly and take responsiblity for opposing, each in his own way, the degeneration of values which you represent.
 
 
Speak for yourself Tartarin, I seriously see the Bush Regime as Fascist/Imperialist and moving further right at an increasing pace - and, I am positive of this (no negativism allowed   ).
 
 
Timber, war is a negativism - when all else fails. The pivot point of the right is war - it appears in all right stands. Sorry, your basic platform hinges on a negative.

$500 billion deficit is a negative and drawing the economy down, high unemployment and growing is a negative, lying is a negative - gotta get some truth telling in there. Hmmmm, reporting on this doesn't make the messenger negative!!!!!!!!!
 
 
Timber and other are just trying that old Spiro Agnew trick -- distinguished member of the Republican party that he was!!!
 
 
Ahhh, yes... "The nattering nabobs of negatavism"... timeless  

I have one of those old Spiro Agnew clocks, the one where the hands run in reverse and the numbers are printed backwards on a stars-and-stripes background. It has been a favorite ever since it was topical.
 
 
Oh darn -- I was out of the country, missed all that stuff. Agnew was a hoot; the clock must be wonderful.
 
 
Of course, Bill W. is correct> War is a negative. I am sure that Bill W. would brand World War II as a negative but I don't think the survivors of the Nazi death camps would say so. I don't think the inhabitants of Poland would say so. I don't think that the people of the Phillipine Islands would say so.

It all depends on your perspective, Bill W.
 
 
The survivors of the Nazi death camps may have included those who tried to escape into the US and were turned back.
 
 
Of course, Tartarin is correct. Some survivors tried to come here and were turned away.

Wasn't FDR or Truman president at the time.

Would you like to research how many people were liberated from the Nazis at the end of World War II and how many were turned away, Tartarin?

if you don't know where to look, perhaps I can do if for you.
 
 
FDR was president. He was not all he was portrayed to be unfortuneately. His wife on the other hand was a great lady.
 
 
She may have been a Great Lady, but she sure talked funny.
 
 
GWBush talks funny too!  
 
 
He walks funny, too  
 
 
We're not going to descend into that butt plug humor again, are we?
 
 
Hadn't even thought of that LW; still, he do walk funny  
 
 
wouldn't that be an ascension lw?
 
 
 
 
 
Possibly and it could be a gerbil.
 
 
LW, Actually, you mispelled it; it should be "garbled," like his whole persona.
 
 
c.i., he is talking about the tunnel rat, the gerbil  

 http://www.ionet.net/~cbb/Deliv2.html 

do a find on gerbil
 
 
Why couldn't both descriptions fit him?
 
 
I don't think The Texan In Chief has cheek pouches... that's one way to tell 'em apart.
 
 
But, he still stores his nuts in his cheeks. Maybe that's the reason his speech is garbled   - agreed c.i.  
 
 
well there's cheek pouches and there's cheek pouches........
 
 
"Godfather IV" with George Bush in the lead as a President who talks funny. At least he will have something to do after his classroom stay as President.
 
 
 
 
 
This one should make the Bush supporters proud.
 http://www.freepress.org/columns.php?strFunc=display&strID=746&strYear=2003&strAuthor=7 
 
 
I'm sure the tighty righties will quiockly say one of two things:
A) We're at war..people die in wars, the sick New Yorkers are heeeeerooos, and should stop whining.
B) Ther is no proof that this stuff is harmful, and suggesting it is is unpatriotic and helps America's enemies in the war on freedom...oops..I mean the war on terrorism, heh, heh, that mike wasn't on was it? Quick, security..detain that reporter...I mean silence him...however you feel like...
 
 
Of course, there's this:

 
HILLARY'S JUNK SCIENCE

By STEVEN MILLOY

September 10, 2003 -- SEN. Hillary Clinton says she'll block President Bush's nominee for chief of the Environmental Protection Agency because the EPA allegedly misled New Yorkers about health risks after the 9/11 attacks.
Overlooking the fact that the president's nominee, Mike Leavitt, was governor of Utah at the time and had no connection to the EPA's post-attack response, Clinton's criticism of the EPA's actions is groundless; she's using 9/11 as a smokescreen to attack the president's choice to head the EPA.

The EPA announced a week after the attacks that the air near Ground Zero was "safe" to breathe. Except for some rescue workers who were overexposed to fumes and dust from the wreckage, that assurance seems to have been correct.

While no one disputes that some overexposed and unprotected rescue workers in the immediate aftermath of the collapse experienced some health effects, there have been no credible reports that the ambient air quality near Ground Zero a week after the attacks, when the EPA made the statement, caused any significant, widespread or long-term harm to the public.

Moreover, an EPA risk evaluation completed a year after the attacks concluded that, after the first few days, ambient air levels were unlikely to cause short-term or long-term health effects to the general population.

But the EPA's inspector general reported in August that the agency "did not have sufficient data to make such a blanket statement" and that the agency gave New Yorkers misleading assurances about potential health risks from the air pollution generated by the World Trade Center collapse.

The IG says the White House Council on Environmental Quality "influenced the collaboration process, the information that EPA communicated to the public, through its early press releases when it convinced EPA to add reassuring statements and delete cautionary ones."

The report dismissed the EPA's year-after risk evaluation: The IG complains that the agency doesn't know how much air pollution people were exposed to, or the health status of the exposed population before the attacks.

But the IG's criticism is absurd because such data are impossible to obtain - they're not even necessary, because there's no indication any health problems were caused by whatever exposures occurred.

Also, the idea that it was inappropriate for the White House to push the EPA to proclaim the air to be safe is wrongheaded.

The EPA chief reports directly to the president. To say that the White House can't influence, much less order, the EPA to take a particular course of action would be to elevate the agency to a separate branch of government, on a par with the president, Congress and Supreme Court.

Moreover, in a time of national emergency, the White House should be directing the EPA. After all, this is an agency that spends most of its time chasing imaginary or infinitesimal health risks from the everyday environment. It's arguably not equipped to operate without supervision in an emergency.

But the report gave Clinton political cover to block Leavitt's nomination. She gets to pose as a protector of New Yorkers and score points with the eco-extremists who are Leavitt's only real foes.

President Bush nominated Leavitt as a political moderate and a consensus builder. "He respects the ability of state and local government to meet [environmental] standards. He rejects the old ways of command and control from above," said the president.

The eco-nuts, in contrast, say Leavitt represents a "hard right turn on the environment."

Finally, city and federal health officials started a project last Friday to track the health histories of 200,000 people exposed to pollution from the WTC. For the same reason that the GAO criticized the EPA's year-after risk evaluation, this project is a waste of time and money.

If Clinton feel the need to "block" something, that project would be a good start.

 

 The article 

Now, as I remember it, the Ground Zero workers weren't happy about the heavy, uncomfortable respirators they were supposed to be wearing... prefering, if any protection at all, the strap-on paper "Painter's Masks" so recently popular in SARS neighborhoods. The Chem Suits didn't go over much bigger, either. There was some concern over this at the time, but you know how those things go. Just an annecdote, here... a very good freind was there for about a week... with his well trained rescue dog. The dog handlers (there were many), wore at least the paper masks most of the time, but there was no such protection for the dogs... something bitched about, but lived with, in the interest of discharging duty and in recognition of the simple fact no dog-resperators were to be had, period. The dogs feet were cut up, despite kevlar booties on some of them, and they were constantly geting gashes and lacerations scrambling around in the shattered, hazard-studded debris field. "In the Pit", there was not only smoke and dust, but the sound and heat of fire from below, for many days. Rescue efforts, as we know, were futile. To keep up the dog's spirits, the handlers would stage "Rescues" here and there throughout the day, letting a dog "Find" a worker who had agreed to be part of "The Game" once in a whiile. I got the impression, from my freind, that the dogs knew it was a scam, but went along with it to keep the handlers from getting depressed. Probably, it went a lot in both ways. Anyway, my buddy remarked particularly about folks "In the Pit" who were op[enly disdainful of the guidelines, and even the minimum requirements, in place for personal safety. He called them "Nuts". A massive infection from a pad cut that refused to heal claimed his dog (a really sweet Lab/Shephard mix, named "Goldie", in March of 02... a little before what would have been her eighth birthday, I think). Some dogs died of respiratory problems too. One was shot by a cop somewhere, and another was killed by a car, none of which has anything to do with my point. But then, apart from a wet bandanna or a very strange-and-uncomfortable-to-a-dog bootie, the pups had no protective gear to choose to disregard.
 
 
Professor Hobibit's comments re: pollution in New York after the WTC tragedy is typical of the almost complete ignorance manifested by the left wing concering the environment and the "supposed global warming"
The left wing appears to know little about "global warming" and utilize kook science to try to prove that the earth is going to be burned up becaause of an alleged large change in temperature caused by greedy entrepreneurs who do not care about the "little people".

I wonder if Professor Hobibit knows that the US Senate voted not to ratify the Kyoto treaty when President Clinton was in office.

Mr. Timberlandko laid it out well. The complaints about the post WTC alleged "pollution are indeed "Hillary'S Junk Science" which is almost as mistaken and twisted as the left's take on the "alleged global pollution.

Hillary's junk science is also a slap in the face to the 3,000 dead. A diversion from the enormity of the crime against them by the fundamentalist Muslims to focus on "supposed" negligence by the Bush Administration.

What garbage emits from Hillary and her gang!
 
 
Here's another link to the NYC health problems.
 http://www.geocities.com/cureworks2/nycair.htm 
 
 
The appeal there on the splashpage of the website to apply medical marijauna to WTC illnesses sure sets the tone right up front, don't it? No guessing there... you know right where they're comming from from the go. Gotta admire that. I know its not as much fiun to read, but when it comes to real news, I prefer real information to opinion most of the time. Its a pity transcripts and charts and spreadsheets and stuff like that don't have more flashy graphics, as a rule. I'm sure if they did, they'd get more attention. Then again, probably not. They still wouldn't offer much in the way of entertainment.
 
 
 
I'm sure the tighty righties will quiockly say one of two things:

 

Well! Righty tighty, lefty loosey!

Oops. That's really how you tell the shop dummie how to turn the wrench on a nut. Sorry guys.
 
 
Yet another link.  http://www.nyenvirolaw.org/PDF/IndexOfJenkins-7-4-03-documentary-d2-2.pdf 
 
 
Ya ever send the shop dummy to the paint locker for a can of safety-stripe paint, rog?
 
 
another.  http://www.yourplanetearth.org/article.pl?sid=03/08/26/0341219&mode=threaded 
 
 
From tonight's Bill Moyers:  NOW with Bill Moyers 
 
 
hobit, The pros and cons are unclear on air polution. What's your take on it?
 
 
I don't know enough about the subject to do more than assimilate what I read in the press. I fail to see how efforts to clean up the environment can be anything but positive. I am disheartened by the efforts of the current admin to gut the EPA and the environment, but I am not surprised. I often get the impression that the far right's idea of a pristine environment is a parking lot. I will say that from what I have read, to doubt the existance of damage done to the environment by the emmison of greenhouse gases and other products of combustion engines is to engage in self delusion. Yes, climate chages over time, but it does so over centuries, and any efforts that mankind may undertake to spare itself some of the more damaging effects of that change should be begin. To ignore the signs of global climate change due to partisan ideology is simple stupidity.
 
 
Uh huh, Timber. And a 50' roll of flight line comes to mind.
 
 
Here are some facts on the so-called "global warming" trumpeted by the left wing crazies.

Evidence from ice cores, glaciers, boreholes, and tree rings, deposits of microscopic animals on the sea floor, pollen in lake beds, and mineral deposits in caves show clearly that surface temperatures in some centuries have been very different from temperatures in others. from roughly 800AD until 1200 AD, for example- during what's called the Medieval Warm Period- the Northern Hemisphere became so hot that the Vikings cultivated Iceland, Greenland and Newfoundland.

As everyone knows, there were no factories or automobiles to "pollute" at that time- It would appear that the earth has cycles of warming and cooling that are NATURAL.
 
 
Professor Hobibit:

I don' t think you can find any evidence of significant "global climate change" ( as you put it) caused by man.

Please note the words significant and caused by man.

I don't think you read the right articles. I will be glad to enlighten you if you wish.
 
 
 
The left wing appears to know little about "global warming" and utilize kook science to try to prove that the earth is going to be burned up becaause of an alleged large change in temperature caused by greedy entrepreneurs who do not care about the "little people".
 

I don't know how much you have actually read on the science of global warming, as opposed to the political arguement, but research by geologists, biologists, meteorologists, etc... has discussed this issue for at least twenty years. I recall hearing about it in my Freshman Bio class in 1985. I don't know of any study that says the earth will be burned up. I do know of studies that suggest climate change from hydrocaron emissions are likely to lead to melting of polar ice caps, leading to a rise in sea level, as well as continued deterioration of the O3 layer, which will lead to increading levels of UV radiation reaching the earth's surface, negatively effecting the struture of biomolecules. This rise in sea level may also effect which areas of the planet support agriculture and which would become inhospitable.
Your hyperbole is unneccesary, except as an attempt to be insulting.

 
Hillary's junk science is also a slap in the face to the 3,000 dead. A diversion from the enormity of the crime against them by the fundamentalist Muslims to focus on "supposed" negligence by the Bush Administration.
 

Erm...many of the dead in all three sites were Muslim. Not all were American.
 
 
 
Professor Hobibit:

I don' t think you can find any evidence of significant "global climate change" ( as you put it) caused by man.

Please note the words significant and caused by man.

I don't think you read the right articles. I will be glad to enlighten you if you wish.
 

Most of what I have read has been in Scientific American, Nature, Nature Biology, American Scientist, Science, and other similar "leftist rags."  
 
 
 
Here are some facts on the so-called "global warming" trumpeted by the left wing crazies.
 

Again, you make the insult, but fail to name these mysterious "crazies."

 
Evidence from ice cores, glaciers, boreholes, and tree rings, deposits of microscopic animals on the sea floor, pollen in lake beds, and mineral deposits in caves show clearly that surface temperatures in some centuries have been very different from temperatures in others. from roughly 800AD until 1200 AD, for example- during what's called the Medieval Warm Period- the Northern Hemisphere became so hot that the Vikings cultivated Iceland, Greenland and Newfoundland.
 

Something I had alluded to before you went on this tirade.

 
As everyone knows, there were no factories or automobiles to "pollute" at that time- It would appear that the earth has cycles of warming and cooling that are NATURAL.
 

Again, no one is arguing this fact with you. Have you difficulty reading for content? Not trying to be insulting, just trying to understand your position.
 
 
I am happy that you agree, Professor Hobibit, concerning the Medieval Warm Period. That would fall in your area of expertise, would it not?

You then concede the fact that the earth's cycles of warming and cooling predate human existence- not to mention SUV's.

To be more specific, The National Academy of Sciences( I am sure that you know, Professor hobibit, of their prestigious standing) said in their report of June 10th 2001 that:

"While the activities of mankind are part of the natural world, the confention exists in most discussions of the atmosphere that "natural process" are those that would still exist without the presence of human beings"

But what is the charge?

The charge is that we are spewing more and more carbon dioxide into the atmosphere and as CO2 rises,it tends to prevent some energy from escaping to space. If the climate system does not shed that extra energy, the buildup of Co2 in the air could enhance the largely natural greenhouse effect.

Eventually, under this scenario, the planet gets so warm that icecaps melt, malarial mosquitos swarm and droughts starve the inhabitants.

So what to do?

In July 1997, the Senate of the United States voted 97-0 AGAINST ratifying any climate-change treaty.

Why?

The icecaps are melting for heaven's sake.

Perhaps the Senators knew more than the tabloids.

Perhaps they knew that

First, the cost of enforcing radical limits on Co2 emissions woluld be from 300 to 400 Billion a year

and

Second, there were great uncertainties about whether the earth would heat up in a dangerous way in the next century and whether human-induced greenhouse gases were a significant culprit.

Here is the conclusion from the Academy's report.

"Because there is considerable UNCERTAINTY in currrent understanding of how the climate system varies naturallyand reacts to emissions of greenhouse gases and aerosols, current estimates of the magnitude of future warming should be regarded AS TENTATIVE AND SUBJECT TO FUTURE ADJUSTMENTS"

Source:

 www.nap.edu/catalog/10139.html?onpi_newbooks_060801 
 
 
All of which I pointed out earlier. However, if there is any possibility we can allay some of the effects, why not do so? Perhaps that's a beter use of funds than tax cuts.
As for the (purported) existance of common sense or intelligence in the legislative branch, look at how many of them are fundamentalist Christians.  
 
 
Professor Hobibit:

Allay effects?

What effects?

What causes the effects?

How much would it cost( the Clinton administration said 300 to 400 Billion) to allay effects which have not been measured adequately and which may be caused by natural effects rather than man made effects.

Note-
No scientist will doubt that over the last 100 years there has been a warming of about 1 degree NEAR THE SURFACE and averaged over the earth. But according to the study made by the National Academy of Sciences referenced earlier there are two important qualifactions of the fact that the temperature at the EARTH'S SURFACE has gone up by 1 Degree Fahreheit.

l. There was a strong surface warming between 189o and 1940 then a cooling( indeed some predicted an Ice-Age)he 1940's to the 1970's) and then a warming from 1970 till now.

It is starnge that the earth was warmer from 1890 to 1940 when Co2 emissions were insignificant compared to today.

Second, The recent warming has been observed onlyu on the surface of the earth. More sophisticated temperature records taken from the surface to a few miles up using NASA satellites show no warming over the past 22 years.
 
 
Yup, c.i., those are links, allright. And one of 'em, nyenvirolaw.org, is an honsest-to-gosh PDF without a single picture in any of its seven pages. The other one, yourplanrtearth.org, was pretty, and had a wonderful, uncharacteristically candid caveat on its sampling page:

 
This whole thing is wildly inaccurate. Rounding errors, ballot stuffers, dynamic IPs, firewalls. If you're using these numbers to do anything important, you're insane.
 
 http://www.yourplanetearth.org/pollBooth.pl?qid=14&aid=8. 
I like candor. They're obviously concerned folks who care about science and the earth, even if I happen to think they're given to a bit of credulous hysteria fanned by less-than-credible science. That's cool, at least they're up front about it.

Now, nyenvirolaw.org sorta lacks candor. IMHO. But then, they're a lawfirm specializing in suing the government, not real environmental activists, so nothing better should be expected. Its how they pay themselves. Fine... everybody's got a right to a job, even if they mask it with an agenda. These guys are about THE MONEY. Their entire 7-page rant was poorly crafted, unscientic, weighted with insinuation and thinly veiled unsupported implications, and revolved around the following:

 
Chapter 2
EPA Statements About Air Quality
Not Adequately Qualified
EPA's early statements reassured the public regarding the safety of the air outside
the Ground Zero perimeter area. However, when EPA made a September 18
announcement that the air was "safe" to breathe, the Agency did not have
sufficient data and analyses to make the statement. The White House Council on
Environmental Quality (CEQ) influenced, through the collaboration process, the
information that EPA communicated to the public through its early press releases
when it convinced EPA to add reassuring statements and delete cautionary ones.
Conclusions from an EPA draft risk evaluation completed over a year after the
attacks have tended to support EPA's statements about long-term health effects
when all necessary qualifications are considered. However, EPA's statements
about air quality did not contain these qualifications.
 
 http://www.epa.gov/oigearth/ereading_room/WTC_report_20030821.pdf  (dialup warning: very large PDF file, digitally signed. Several minutes to download over a 512K DSL connection).

The EPA admits it made mistakes. Obviously, that was their mistake... it was the perfect opening for envirolaw. It doesn't matter much to envirolaw that subsequent studies showed nor abnormal hazard in fact existed; the REAL ISSUE, according to envirolaw, is that the EPA, treading unexplored territory in a time of great pressure, uncertainty, and general shock, disbelief, and horror, made a mistake... a mistake acknowledged freely, and a mistake of no demonstrated dire consequence, but a mistake that promises good pickings from a lawsuit against what in the end is The American Taxpayer. In the cited report, and in its predecessors and all the related commentaries, addendums, and corrections, other mistakes are acknowledged. That's pretty much the point of reports; "Lets see what we could have done better, so we can do better if there is a next time." I would suggest that rather than read about the EPA report, you read the EPA report... and its predecessors. The are public domain and easy to find. They have some pictures, too... not flashy graphics so much, but illustrative none the less. Alltogether, there are a couple thousand pages, but a lot of that is charts, tables, source citations, and the like, so prolly only a few hundred actual text-only pages. I figure you get a lot more out of going to the source when its available... even if the source doesn't read with the energy, snap, and goodfeeling of the stories and opinion pieces about it. I'm funny that way. I prefer to look at the facts and form my own opinion. I may or may not endorse someone else's opinion, but I generally have my own, relatively informed, opinion, whether or not anybody else may endorse or contest that opinion.
 
 
The "Your planet Earth" link( thank you, CI) had a rather good, but, in my opinion, incomplete, section on why the talks on Kyoto failed. Anyone interested in the so-called "global warming should read that link.
 
 
 
All of which I pointed out earlier. However, if there is any possibility we can allay some of the effects, why not do so?
 

First, there are other discussions in A2K where you ought to be making these arguments, second, ever hear the phrase "there's no free lunch"?

Kyoto would have plunged the US into a deep and lengthy depression. How many additional children are you willing to plunge into poverty because you think it "couldn't hurt" to try to solve a problem we may not have, may not be causing and may not be able to change? You care about the environment? Kyoto obligates 28 nations to take action, and requires NOTHING of all others. Under Kyoto, many industries that operate relatively cleanly under tight US environmental regulations would have two choices; go bankrupt or ship their facilities to countries not constrained by Kyoto. Suddenly you've replaced cleaner factories operating under strict controls with dirty factories operating under few or no regulations.

So, Kyoto, the "answer" to global warming that "we might as well try because it couldn't hurt" ends up causing poverty and increasing global environmental damage.

And that for something we ought to try "just because".   There is no free lunch, and you can't make the kind of changes global warming wonks are clamoring for without reaping some negative consequences. So, you are effective asking people to accept almost certain and extreme negative consequences in an effort to avert distant, uncertain and largely harmless consequences.

Not for me, thanks.
 
 
As a personal view on the ozone layer, I'm of the opinion that there isn't enough science to determine whether what we see today is a normal cycle or CO2 is the culprit. The ozone layer hole around the Antarctic 'seems' to be getting larger. The snow around the Andes Mountains seems to be melting away at an alarming rate. The icefields in Canada seems to be melting away. As for the situation in New York City after nine-eleven, I just don't trust this administration to tell the truth. That the EPA would declare that the air was 'clean' soon after the destructdion of the twin towers seems on the surface very irresponsible. Toxic dust seems reasonable even to this lay person. We still don't have stats on long-term health effects. On the other side of the coin is the small pox scare of this administration; they made all the military folks take the small pox immunization including health care workers. We have been learning that there are no biological or chemical weapons in Iraq, including small pox. On the one side, there were provable toxins in the air in New York City. On the other, there were no evidence of small pox, but this administration forced our military to get those immunization for a non-existent disease. It's only my opinion.
 
 
I received this from a friend in Australia.
*********************************

Most of us know Asbestos fibers, when ingested, are a proven cause of cancer. Some us might know that the World Trade Center towers were two of the last big buildings constructed with asbestos.

When the twin towers collapsed in September 2001, they filled New York City with a lethal mix of not only asbestos but the pulverised dust of countless computer screens, light fixtures, calculators, telephones, network servers,
paging systems, copy machines and other office equipment laden with mercury and other toxic metals.

The Environmental Protection Agency quickly acted to advise that spewing such a toxic mix into New York's air presented a lethal danger to the public, but that lives could be saved by taking precautions.

But we now hear that the White House intercepted these planned EPA warnings, citing "competing considerations" ahead of the health of the
people of New York -- including the re-opening of the stock exchange as quickly as possible, and limiting clean-up costs and liability claims.

As a result of these actions, the long-term death toll from the WTC attacks could eventually reach many thousands more than the initial toll. And those slow and agonising deaths will have been directly at the hand of the US president.
 
 
ci would that be murf?
 
 
Yup!
 
 
Commentary > Daniel Schorr
from the September 26, 2003 edition

A war still in search of a rationale

By Daniel Schorr

WASHINGTON – It is more than six months since the invasion of Iraq, and it remains a war in search of a rationale.
A massive search and a series of investigations of scientists and technicians have yet to produce the weapons of mass destruction that were supposed to put the US in danger imminent enough to justify preemptive action. A Washington Post poll last month showed that 69 percent of Americans believing that Saddam Hussein had some role in the Sept. 11 attacks. But the Bush administration seems ambivalent about whether to keep making that assertion.
In his May 1 victory speech from the aircraft carrier Abraham Lincoln, Mr. Bush said that the Iraq battle was "one victory in the war on terror that began on Sept. 11."
Since then, the administration has become much less definite. On NBC's "Meet the Press" on Sept. 14, Vice President Dick Cheney called Iraq "the geographic base of the terrorists who have had us under assault now for many years, but most especially on 9/11." Two days later, Defense Secretary Donald Rumsfeld seemed to contradict Mr. Cheney, telling a news conference he had no reason to believe that Hussein had a hand in the 9/11 attacks. And the very next day, Bush, seeming to side with Mr. Rumsfeld, said "we have no evidence that Saddam Hussein was involved with Sept. 11."
And yet, in his United Nations speech on Tuesday, Bush said that Iraq was "the central front" in the war against terrorism, as though reluctant to give up the theme of Iraq's link to terrorism.
Then there was the bizarre new justification of the war offered by Secretary of State Colin Powell. In a visit to the Kurdish region in northern Iraq, Mr. Powell said that a 1998 poison-gas attack that killed 5,000 Kurds was justification enough for bringing down Hussein. What made his statement so bizarre was that at the time of the poison-gas attack, he was President Reagan's national security adviser. In those days the US was backing Iraq in its war with Iran. While the Reagan administration condemned the use of chemical weapons as a "grave violation" of international law, no sanctions were imposed on the Baghdad regime.
"The world should have acted sooner," Powell told Kurdish families at a mass grave site. As a justification for the invasion of Iraq 15 years later, that's almost embarrassing.
 
 
Daniel shorr is an intelligent guy, but he really does not have a good radio voice. His voice makes me turn channels.
 
 
That is two personal opinions, but what about his points?
 
 
Well, I have been meaning to mention it before and I had this article reminded me to say as much.

Acquiunk, wouldn't your post stating I was making personal comments and getting away from the original post missing the point that you were trying to make?
 
 
Yeah, "does not have a good radio voice" says nothing about the article.
 
 
You both are absolutely correct. Thank you for pointing out the fact that I am NOT TALKING ABOUT THE ARTICLE!
 
 
So what do you think about the article?
 
 
 
 
 
Doesn't anyone care that the weapons may not have been destroyed, rather, they may have been given away or sold on the black market?

I'd be willing to bet any of you that there are hidden WMD's in Iraq that will never be found. Pretty good bet huh?
 
 
Prove it!!!!!!!!!!
 
 
It's a good bet Bill because that's a demand that can't be reasonably made:

"ever seen elephants hide in trees?"

There ARE WMDs in Iraq. Anthrax can be found in nature. The point is that it's pretty obvious now that the degree to which this posed a realistic threat was hyped.
 
 
That's why I made it -  

BTW, the proof of your conjecture (and the point I take most damaging)

"And we know where they are!"
 
 
I seem to recall this same unreasonable demand prior to the invasion, when the US demanded Iraq prove they did not have WMD; they were then commanded to provide proof they destroyed the weapons they did not have.

You can't prove a negative.
 
 
Maybe you can't prove a negative but it is a handy-dandy ploy when you want an excuse to go to war.
 
 
Iraq was required to prove not that it had no WMD, but that it had divested itself of known weaponry and related developmental and production capability. Iraq was not required to prove a negative; the mandate was to prove compliance. This Iraq failed to do. The disposition of much of that known inventory and capability remains in question.
 
 
pre-emptive war, not scantioned, for non-compliance of a resolution not of our making, sold under dubious intel, sans provocation? no matter what your politics, that, quiet simply, does not, nor will not instill any international confidence of America's agenda.
 
 
A resumption of hostilities following over a decade of evasion, defiance, obstruction, and overt hostile action on the part of the sanctioned party is not pre-emptive in my book. As a member of the UN, bearing the brunt of the cost and effort required by the innefectual containment-and-inspection paradigm, the US was fully justified to insist that Iraq be brought once and for all, one way or the other, to task for her continued intransigence. There was no peace to be broken, there was merely a pause in major actions.
 
 
"A resumption of hostilities following over a decade of evasion, defiance, obstruction, and overt hostile action on the part of the sanctioned party is not pre-emptive in my book."

But pre-emption was precisely a reason of the Bush Admin's invasion of Iraq.

The National Security Strategy of the United States of America, September 17, 2002, Chapter V. states:

"We must be prepared to stop rogue states and their terrorist clients before they are able to threaten or use weapons of mass destruction against the United States and our allies and friends."

The NSSUSA is apologizing preemption.
 
 
Bush acted on this doctrine as a legitemizer of his invasion.
 
 
That I would agree with. The Iraq invasion was an experiment to see how loudly the world would squawk at the US invading a large nation in defienace of international law and goodwill. The results seem to have been mixed.  
 
 
And I would posit the mixed reception evidences that some fail to grasp the present, and yet evolving, nature of threats to global security. Folks seem to be more inclined to prepare fight the previous war as opposed to dealing proactively with the circumstances threatening to bring on the next one. Though hindsight may be 20/20, it does nothing to prevent current affairs from unexpectedly whacking you in the back of the head while your attention is elsewhere.
 
 
Atthis point, in my not so humble opinion, the US is tied with the stateless terrorists as the number one threat to world peace and security.
 
 
I'll grant the two are participants in the struggle. I perceive, however, many fail to recognize that the struggle is all-encompassing. At the risk of inviting comparison (unwarranted, and at core misconstrued, IMO) to "Bring 'em on", I would say that one may choose either to be part of the solution or to remain part of the problem. It comes down to "Lead, follow, or get out of the way", to continue the descent into aphorisms.
 
 
And, I believe you are bandying words around an immoral, criminal act that is terrorism on a super power level that only results in further violence and sanctions counter actions of a like nature!!
 
 
Lots of folks address the problem with words, Bill. Some take action. Another aphorism: "Those who can, and choose to, do. Those who can't, or won't, criticize"
 
 
There is more than one way to "take action", other than with slings and arrows. I think that if the "after war" proves anything, it proves that the UN and its actions were doing a great job and that Bush's actions have riled a hornets nest.......

BTW, I thought before that if Bush would have waited, Saddam would have finally broached the legal line. Today, I believe that would not have happened.

The only true results I see is that continued, increased and stonger containment was the only appropriate "action".
 
 
That's a reasonable, informed, principled opinion Bill. It is not, however, the only one to be drawn from the evidence. I feel containment had been demonstrated conclusively to be futile and counterproductive, and that concerted, focused, remedial action was mandated, was undertaken, and is being successfully carried out.
 
 
futile   counterproductive   successfully carried out  

appropriated expenditures of grater than $140 billion, one dead is too many, expanded terrorism, <sigh> evidence does seem to be damning to many

But the point of lack to "take action", and therefore, one reasons a whimp, and your steadfast reference to either being on your side or on their side I believe to be fully false, and when I counter that with valid evidence - I take umbrage to your position!
 
 
I intend no affront, Bill, merely disagreement and divergent opinion. I surely take no umbrage at your position; I merely do not share it. Neither of us is the greater or the lesser for any of that; we merely see it differently.
 
 
If not, then there wouldn't be two parties. Of course, I pray for multiple parties with open coalitions being required - as, I am neither a Rep nor a Dem, both being much too extremist for me!!!
 
 
There's a lot to be said for Multi-Party Coalition Government... the Italians, for example, have so much more fun during their elections than we seem to. Then again, they've had about 59 governments in the last 58 years, haven't they?  

"A committee is the least efficient means through which to accomplish anything of importance" :wink:
 
 
 
I seem to recall this same unreasonable demand prior to the invasion, when the US demanded Iraq prove they did not have WMD; they were then commanded to provide proof they destroyed the weapons they did not have.

You can't prove a negative.
 

The notion that Iraq did destroy weapons, but didn't bother to document that fact is so far fetched, I question the intellect of anyone who considers it a possibility.
 
 
If there are hidden WMD's in Iraq that are NEVER found then it stands to reason they'll NEVER be used so what's the problem?
 
 
 
If there are hidden WMD's in Iraq that are NEVER found then it stands to reason they'll NEVER be used so what's the problem?
 

The problem is that what apparently passes for reason with you, is not what passes for reason with me; nor do I suspect is it in fact objectively reasonable.

Or to put it another way, your too-cute comment falls apart if anyone knows where they are or ever stumbles upon them, and (to parallel my recent comment) the notion that nobody knows where they are is daft.
 
 
gosh scrat...a little bitchy today? I wasn't addressing you...I was responding to the previous comment by cjhsa.....and I was being serious. Please take your seat.
 
 
 
The notion that Iraq did destroy weapons, but didn't bother to document that fact is so far fetched, I question the intellect of anyone who considers it a possibility.
 

Precisely.

Could you describe what you think "proof they destroyed them" might look like?

A 'document'? Seems like those crafty Iraqis could've "sexed "something up without much trouble (as if that would've satisfied anyone enough to stave off an invasion)...

Pieces of something? Like a ten-year-old centrifuge buried in someone's back yard?

Here's some very cut-and-dried factoids, Scrat:

Nearly six months of furious searching by thousands of US Army personnel, David Kay and 1400 inspectors, and God knows who else.

No weapons found; no proof weapons destroyed.

And your contention remains...what, exactly? "they must be somewhere.... "?

Whose intellect is questionable? [/b]
 
 
Ockham's Razor
"Pluralitas non est ponenda sine neccesitate'', which translates as ``entities should not be multiplied unnecessarily".

Hanlon's Razor:
"Never attribute to malice that which can be adequately explained by stupidity".

 http://phyun5.ucr.edu/~wudka/Physics7/Notes_www/node10.html 

The application of these two rules would suggest that if no weapons of mass destruction can be found, and there is no record of their destruction, they did not exist.
 
 
I may be missing something here, but where is the evidence that the acknowledged, known, catalogued, still-unaccounted-for materiel did not exist? Where is the evidence of what happened to it?
 
 
WMD's or no WMD's, Complicity in 9/11 or not, support of terrorism or not. Compliance to the UN mandates or not. Would have made no difference. Bush, or at least his brain trust had decided that Saddam had to go and a regime change was a must. The rest is history. We, our children and grandchildren will be paying for that grand fiasco..
 
 
 
WMD's or no WMD's, Complicity in 9/11 or not, support of terrorism or not. Compliance to the UN mandates or not. Would have made no difference. Bush, or at least his brain trust had decided that Saddam had to go and a regime change was a must. The rest is history. We, our children and grandchildren will be paying for that grand fiasco..
 

A M E N!
 
 
 
gosh scrat...a little bitchy today? I wasn't addressing you...I was responding to the previous comment by cjhsa.....and I was being serious. Please take your seat.
 

I wasn't aware that you had to be addressing me for me to have an opinion of your opinion.   Perhaps you meant to send cjhsa a PM and got confused? Otherwise, post to a public forum and your comments are fair game.
 
 
 
Nearly six months of furious searching by thousands of US Army personnel, David Kay and 1400 inspectors, and God knows who else.

No weapons found; no proof weapons destroyed.

And your contention remains...what, exactly? "they must be somewhere.... "?
 

Well done, I knew you'd get a clue eventually! That is precisely my point... That which once existed either still exists or was destroyed; and evidence exists in either case. That said evidence is not revealing itself quickly enough for your liking does not change that simple fact.
 
 
Just a little non-specific, non-accusatory, general, pre-emptory sort of reminder here... remember to play fair when exercizing the fair game option  
 
 
my my scrat we are pms ing today aren't we? Try a Midol and have a nice day.
 
 
 
my my scrat we are pms ing today aren't we? Try a Midol and have a nice day.
 

My dearest BPB, I always have a nice day! You'd be surprised what a bracing tonic being right so often is! (In fact, I imagine you'd be very surprised... experiencing it as rarely as I'm sure you do.) :wink:
 
 
Frank A Pisa quotes Au 1929 who says that President Bush or at least his brain trust decided that Saddam had to go.

I don't think Frank A Pisa and Au 1929 are up on their reading. Frank A Pisa never gives documentation or evidence. Au 1929 does once in a while.

What Frank A Pisa and Au 1929 do not know or refuse to understand is that President Bush and his brain trust do not exist in a vacuum. They do have access to all kinds of documentation that has gone before.

I know that Frank A Pisa and Au 1929 will not be able to explain the following since it does not fit into their thesis that President Bush and his brain trust decided Saddam will have to go. They do not tell us why President Bush and his brain trust decided Saddam had to go.

At least one important reason why President Bush and his brain trust decided Saddam had to go is that they were advised by the most brilliant foreign policy expert we have ever had as President- William Jefferson Clinton.

On December 16th 1998, Clinton ordered the bombing of Iraq.

Clinton said in his speech:

QUOTE

SO WE WILL PURSUE A LONG-TERM STRATEGY TO CONTAIN IRAQ AND ITS WEAPONS OF MASS DESTRUCTION AND WORK

TOWARD

THE

DAY

WHEN

IRAQ

HAS

A

GOVERNMENT

WORTHY

OF

ITS

PEOPLE

and

"The credible threat to use force, and when necessary, the actual use of force, is the surest way to contain SADDAM'S WEAPONS OF MASS DESTRUCTION PROGRAM, curtail his agression and prevent another Gulf War"

and

"The hard fact is that so long as Saddam remains in power, he threatens the well-being of his people, the peace of his region, the security of the world.'

Can(will?) Au 1929 and Frank A Pisa deal with the above.

It is clear that Clinton wanted Saddam removed and thought he was a threat and felt that he had WMD's.

Is Au1929 and Frank A Pisa saying that President Bush should have totally ignored Clinton's warnings?

It appears clear to me that BOTH presidents thought Saddam should be removed; that Saddam was a danger to the world and that Saddam had WMD's.
 
 
Scrat is indeed correct.

 http://www.un.org 

reports the following:

(and it is to be noted that Hans Blix is NOT in the CIA)

quote

"He (Blix) questions Iraq's claim concering the quality, quantity and DISPOSITION of VX Nerve Gas produced by Iraq as well as the claims that Iraq had destroyed 8,500 liters of Anthrax. IN ADDITION HE REPORTS THAT IRAQ HAS TESTED TWO MISSLES IN EXCESS OF THE PERMITTED RANGE OF 159 KILOMETER>"

It is clear that the latter point was established. Blix said that Saddam did have WMD's AT LEAST AS FAR AS MISSLES WERE CONCERNED.
 
 
Italgato,

Missles are not WMDs. Payloads are.

Regards
 
 
Mr. De Kere:

Tell that to the Israelis who were hit with the missles during Desert Storm!!!
 
 
very cutting edge scrat...I guess you told me....
 
 
Italgato,

I have no need to tell the Israelis as they understand it perfectly and are not the ones calling short range missles WMDs.

Again, Iraq had missles that exceeded the limit stipulated to them by a few miles.

Was it a violation?

Yes.

Is a missle that is a violation of a distance restriction an WMD?

No.

Did you call the violative missles WMDs?

Yes.

Were you wrong?

By every definition of WMDs that is used in international treaties yes you were.
 
 
Yes, you are correct, Mr. De Kere:

I was wrong. But I have an excuse.

You must forgive me and I know you will when I tell you why I keep talking about Iraq's WMD's.

You see, Mr. De Kere, I believe that Bill Clinton was not only the best president of the twentieth century but the brightest and the best informed. Everyone said he was a "policy wonk"

He was so brilliant, he barely studied at Yale Law School but passed his courses with high grades.

You see, Mr. De Kere: I simply believe Bill Clinton when he said on December 16, 1998 that:

"And mark my words, he( Saddam) will develop weapons of mass destruction. He will deploy them and he will use them."
 
 
The difference between belief and reality is something worth considering.

Do you still believe Saddam will use WMDs?
 
 
Please Mr. De Kere:

Did you not read my post?

I did not say Saddam would use WMD's. The brightest president of the twentieth century said it.

Was he wrong?

If you think so, let me know please.

I have read many very bright people who said that Clinton was a genius in the area of foreign relations.

Perhaps you do not agree with them. That's fine.

I believe Clinton when he said that Saddam would develop, use and deploy WMD's some day.

That, of course, will not take place any more since Saddam has been removed from power.

But it is clear that President Bill Clinton warned us.

He( Saddam) will develop,use and deploy WMD's some day.

That statement is a very clear warning from Clinton to the people of the USA.
 
 
Yes, I believe Clinton was wrong. I have told you this before and as a ploy it falls flat.

You might note that I do not play the silly partisan games. I do not care about you sarcastically referencing Clinton. I do not think Clinton to have always been correct.

In short, it's an intellectually bankrupt argument and to keep using with me is pointless because I do not care if you mock Clinton and I happen to think that Clinton speaks for me no more than you do.
 
 
Thnak you for your honesty, Mr. De Kere.

I think you are indeed a person with penetrating insights and an independent spirit. I think I am coming around to your way of thinking. I will recant. Clinton was wrong about WMD's. Bush is wrong about WMD's. Saddam was right about WMD's. Did he not say he did not have them?

Now, Mr. De Kere. we have a very heavy duty placed on our shoulders. We have to convince the American voting public that Clinton and Bush were wrong about WMD's and Saddam is correct.

That is going to be tough!!!
 
 
What do you mean "we"..?

In my above post I did not say that Saddam did not have WMDs. The statement being referenced included what will most likely be a fallacious prediction about their deployment and employment.

And your quest is, indeed, likely to be difficult for you are going to have to go it alone. I do not share the confidence in my ability to sway millions of opinions that you do and Tonto's immortal words to the Lone Ranger are apropos.
 
 
I am indeed sorry that you will not join me, Mr. De Kere. Tonto's words not withstanding.( By the way, did you know that the Lone Ranger discovered, during his old age, that Kemo Sabe meant "Horse's Behind"?)

That was the only possible outcome for Tonto since the advent of "political correctness." Otherwise Tonto would have been viewed as an Indian Oreo.

I guess I will just have to strike out on my own, picking up the few who will have the courage to abjure both Clinton and Bush.

That would leave only The Friends of the Earth, the extremist elements from PETA and the Esperanto Club.

I think it would be a lost cause.

But I will try!!!
 
 
Italgato
If you are asking to read Bush's alleged mind IMO that would be impossible. Who would be able to cut through all that confusion. You ask why Bush attacked Iraq, one thing is sure it was not for the reasons claimed, that has been unequivocally established. You seem to be convinced it was because of Saddams potential to manufacture and use WMD's. That could be said for more than a few nations around the world. Are we to eventually attack all of them using the same logic? I would like to remind you that the US is in the same category.
As for substantiating documentation. What is it but some "experts" opinion? I have seen some drone on about the book they read and act as if the authors opinion was gospel when in reality it is opinion. The author will put together bits and pieces of information and opinion that coincide with his opinion and present his biased theses as fact in a well written book.
I call it dueling authors when two people argue using divergent books or authors as a basis. In effect your substantiating documentation in most instances is merely very well put together opinion.
To get back to the original question, why did Bush attack Iraq when he did? You tell me, it certainly was not for the stated reasons.
 
 
Craven is wrong. Missiles are WMD as the term is used in this debate--namely as shorthand for weapons or weapon-related items Iraq was barred from possessing or developing under existing UN sanctions. It is quibbling to call a missile a delivery vehicle... fine, they had banned delivery vehicles. The penalty is the same.
 
 
 
Is Au1929 and Frank A Pisa saying that President Bush should have totally ignored Clinton's warnings?

It appears clear to me that BOTH presidents thought Saddam should be removed; that Saddam was a danger to the world and that Saddam had WMD's.
 

Ahhh....Gato's reasoning reminds me of the old bumper sticker that read:

BETTER DEAD THAN RED!

My thoughts on reading that were always: Holy shit! Aren't there any other choices?

Gato, using his/her usual deficient logic apparently thinks the only choices available to Bush were...

a) Totally ignore Clinton's warnings to the world

or

b) Attack Iraq preemptively -- and despite lack of concurrence of the Security Council.

Somebody please explain to Gato that his reasoning is very amateurish -- and not especially logical.

Bush could have heeded the advice -- and still not made a preemptive attack.

Jeez!
 
 
Scrat
Any port in a storm. The reasons for the invasion of Iraq has been exposed as grand fabrications by this administration. Arguing that delivery systems are WMD's is stretching that even the administration did not even attempt.
 
 
The adminstration continues to admit there are no WMD. A very nervous Condelezza was on Meet the Press over the weekend continuing to vacilate on actually saying anything other than what hasn't been said before ad nauseum. Tim Russert seemed to finally relent because he didn't want to look like he was taking advantage of her vulnerability on the subject. They had better find WMD and quit with the rationlizations because the majority of the American people are not buying it.
The fact that more Americans have been killed during the Iraqi invasion and the "aftermath" than the entire two years of our involvement in Vietnam is ominously proving, once again, that what we learn from history is that we don't learn from history.
 
 
Scrat
I should also add further if missiles are WMD's we the US is the only one guilty of using them. Since the US uses them extensively. In fact the US is the only one that does.
As for Bush listening to Clinton. I see no call by Clinton for a preemptive attack. In addition the moment Bush came into office he was intent in ignoring any of Clinton's diplomatic initiatives.
 
 
By the law of attrition, conventional weapons can become WMD.
 
 
LW
What?
 
 
 
Craven is wrong. Missiles are WMD as the term is used in this debate--namely as shorthand for weapons or weapon-related items Iraq was barred from possessing or developing under existing UN sanctions. It is quibbling to call a missile a delivery vehicle... fine, they had banned delivery vehicles. The penalty is the same.
 

Your statement is contradictory. I claimed that a missle is not a Weapon of Mass Destruction without an WMD payload.

I noted that the missles exceeded the range limits by a few miles. I noted that they were violative.

I claimed that they were not WMDs.

You claim I am wrong. Please back it up. It's not "quibbling" it's correcting an outright flase statement.

Again, in case you missed it the last time:

The world operates under a definition of WMDs that do not include missles that simply go a few miles over a stipulated limit. There is no definition in use taht would include a missle that is a few miles in violation of range restrictions as a WMD.

Yes they were a small violation of the distance restrictions. No duh! Now please support your claim that I was "wrong" to state that they are not WMDs.
 
 
I think what LW is gettin' at is that if you use enough conventional weapons you can accomplish mass detruction. Sorta right, I guess, but a finepoint. Still, by definition, any number of raids by hundreds of massed bombers, carpeting cities with explosives and incindiaries accomplished much mass destruction in WWII.
 
 
Timber
Based upon that war itself can be classified as a WMD which it no doubt is. However, not by the present definition.
 
 
Political semantics used in rhetoric to fool some of the people all of the time or all of the people some of the time.
 
 
I find it very hard to believe how the definition of WMD is changing with the realization that there are none in Iraq, or none found yet. I suppose I'm guilty of assuming everyone had the same vision I had during that time before the attack on Iraq. They were visions of Saddam with his finger on the little red switch, grinning gleefully as he destroys large numbers of innocent people. This is the way I heard the warnings from the White House.....doom was certain if we didn't act quickly. We didn't have the time to wait until our allies agreed with us. I find it very hard to believe that Bush would have gotten the support he did from the Congress and the American people if they had not believed that what was meant by WMD meant exactly what we were encouraged to believe it meant. Quibbling aside, this administration was either horribly misinformed (which I doubt) or they lied in order to go right on, impulsively risking the lives of innocent people. In fact it's this administration's responsibility that so many innocent people have been killed. It was really George Bush with his little finger on the switch, all itchy to pull the trigger. Remember that smirk he got during the debates before the 2000 election when he talked about capital punishment? Disgusting that he is trying to cover it up now. unbelievable....
 
 
The truth and this administration are strangers. Someone should for the sake of all of us introduce them to each other.
 
 
The very people who crucify Clinton for changing the definition of sexual relations now use the same technique for WMD's.

Difference being in Clinton's case we have a stained dress...in GWB's case a devastated country, dead people all over the place and a total loss of respect for our country globally.

But I'm sure Bill has had another blowjob since then, and I'm also sure GWB will start a third war if he gets a chance.

Genocide and war=All American, Red White and Blue patriotism.

Blowjob= Satanic erosion of all America stands for.

Any questions?
 
 
very good, Bear.......and IMO absolutely on target.
 
 
No one in The Current Administration is "changing the definition of WMD". Asserting that such is the case is itself a Weapon of Mass Distraction.

1) Saddam had and used WMD
2) Saddam was required to provide proof he had complied with International Mandate to divest himself of WMD and associated capabilities.
3) He failed to do so, whether by design or any other reason.

Where's the problem? I submit the greatest failing of The Current Administration in the matter was that it allowed itself to be swept along with popular misperception and misdirection. The issue was never that Saddam was hiding WMD, the issue was, and remains, that Saddam defied the obligation placed on and accepted by him to provide verification he had properly disposed of known, catlogued, and as yet unsatisfactorily accounted for, WMD materiel and associated developmental and production capability.

I submit the lying, obfuscation, misdirection, and trumping-up-of-charges comes not from The Current Administration, but from its critics. The Current Administration is guilty of letting itself play the game by rules made up by others as the game progressed. That disingenuousness and lack of determined focus on the part of The Current Administration was incredibly stupid. I have no reservation they did the right thing, but I take strong exception to their having done the right thing for the wrong reasons.

Much the same sort of sophistry and subversion of fact exists in the popular myth that the impeachment of Clinton revolved around his affair with Lewinsky. The conviction and sanctions levied against him specifically address his having been proven to have lied under oath in the matter of Jones vs. Clinton. The text of the lie, the personages or events comprising the circumstance of the lie, nor any other aspect of the lie, simply are not germaine. The issue was that a lie, irrespective concerning what or whom, uncontestably was issued while under oath, a simple fact now clouded irretrievably by spin.

The trumping in both instances is that of spin over reality. Perception really is everything, in the mind of the public.
 
 
 
I submit the lying, obfuscation, misdirection, and trumping-up-of-charges comes not from The Current Administration, but from its critics.
 

Nah, Timber.

Bush is a liar -- and this entire fiasco has been lie piled on lie right from the beginning.

I know you are a conservative -- and I recognize that you might want to defend this pathetic administration with all the ammo in your arsenal, but don't go overboard.

He is a liar. His advisors were liars.

This thing has been a fiasco -- and will continue to be a fiasco until this group is thrown out of office.
 
 
timber, It's not so easy to skirt around the claims that this administration used about WMD's and their locations. Did they just disappear? Come on, get real!
 
 
timber, If you're buying this administration's justifications for going to war with Iraq, why are they now talking about "terrorism' and the "Iraqi People?"
 
 
What is real is that this administration may well have acted in good faith, based on available evidence and on apparently corroborative though erroneous information supplied to them by supposedly trusted, or at least credible, third parties, which disinformation may have been provided with malicious intent and which was not accorded sufficient scrutiny. I do not say that IS the case, I posit that it MAY be the case. I rather suspect that in fact it indeed is the case, and I expect near-term developments indicative of such. I posit that The Current Administration BELIEVED, and acted on, invalid information. They did not lie; they were merely wrong in the assumptions from which they proceeded. That in itself calls to question their competence.
 
 
On such a vast scale, from every possible quarter - right. I have a 12, 15 and 18 year old. I don't accept this from them either. What happened to accountablility?
 
 
Doubt grows over prewar intelligence

Upcoming Kay report is already stoking skepticism of prewar claims, which are under fire in Congress.

By Peter Grier | Staff writer of The Christian Science Monitor

WASHINGTON – Some seven months after the US invaded Iraq, criticism of the intelligence used to justify that attack is only intensifying. House Intelligence Committee members recently wrote to the director of central intelligence, George Tenet, complaining of "inadequate information" to back administration claims of Iraqi ties to Al Qaeda, and possession of weapons of mass destruction

You can't fool our congress they are sharp as a dull butter knife.
 http://csmonitor.com/2003/0930/p01s01-usfp.html 
 
 
Yes, this administration used bad information to start the war that eventually killed about 7,000 Iraqis. They did not confirm first hand the information they received from exiles from Iraq. Any court of law will question using that kind of information as a legal defense. Hearsay is not enough to justify the killing of innocent people.
 
 
It is if you are bound to go to war anyway.  
 
 
If there were any possibility of being wrong, they had the responsibility to make sure it was confirmed by our own intelligence. Saying they "believed" is insufficient to start a preemptive war. They must "know" without doubt.
 
 
After all, they know where they are hidden. If we could only get Blix out of the way..........
 
 
It does appear to me more that they were duped, not that they were duplicitous. While perhaps absolved thereby of one failing, they would be appropriately subject to approbation and sanction for the other. Sorta outta the frying pan into the fire, I would think, and if my suspicions prove out, I'll be quite happy to stoke the fire. One way or another, heads should roll over this. I suspect some will, but I am under no delusion that the proper ones will get the axe. We're gonna see lots of "Plausible Deniability", I imagine. Oddly enough, the situation as it appears to be developing affords The Current Administration significant opportunity to bolster its position in The Public Mind. If "The Handlers" are as ruthless, self-serving, wiley and cagey as they are by some alleged to be, that is just about a given.
 
 
 
It does appear to me more that they were duped, not that they were duplicitous
 

Who was duped, who was duplicitous. I say the administration was duplicitous and the congress was duped, as were many of the American people.
 
 
Timber,

Saddam may or may not have had WMD; no one has provided definitive proof either way. Bush made it seem, however, that Saddam not only HAD them, but that he was poised to use them against us in the immediate future. This was Bush's justification for pre-emptive invasion. We invaded Iraq on the basis of what we THOUGHT we knew about Saddam's arsenal.

What about what we DEFINITELY know about North Korea ? That it positively has nuclear weapons. That it absolutely has the capability to target and reach the west coast with those weapons.

What about what we DEFINITELY know about Saudi Arabia ? That it harbors and finances terrorist organizations. That all the 911 participants were almost all Saudis.

Why no pre-emptive strikes in those cases ?

I believe we invaded Iraq because we could. (Saddam was the perfect villain.) And because it was and always had been part of the Cheney-Rumsfeld agenda, perhaps to "send a message", perhaps for oil, perhaps for flag-waving political benefits.

I am a proud American, I love my country, I support using our troops in defense of our country, but.... this invasion was not about defending anything, except perhaps W's political a ss.

It took a long time for the truth about Vietnam to come out. I hope we can get at the truth much sooner in this case.
 
 
 
What is real is that this administration may well have acted in good faith, based on available evidence and on apparently corroborative though erroneous information supplied to them by supposedly trusted, or at least credible, third parties, which disinformation may have been provided with malicious intent and which was not accorded sufficient scrutiny. I do not say that IS the case, I posit that it MAY be the case. I rather suspect that in fact it indeed is the case, and I expect near-term developments indicative of such. I posit that The Current Administration BELIEVED, and acted on, invalid information. They did not lie; they were merely wrong in the assumptions from which they proceeded. That in itself calls to question their competence.
 

Of course it is POSSIBLE, Timber, but if you are guessing it is PROBABLE, you are being naive.

If these people wanted the truth, they could have gotten it. At very least, they could have gotten a "WE SIMPLY DO NOT KNOW."

They let it be known what they wanted the intelligence to read -- and, in the mysterious way Washington sometimes works -- that is what it read.

MY GUESS: The wanted a reason to strong arm the Security Council and attack Iraq -- and they were determined to find it. When it came, it came in part manufactured; in part serendipitous; and in part due to error.

Every indication is that they are as guilty of duplicity as they are of stupidity and hubris -- and quite honestly, they were loaded with those last two.

This entire fiasco sucks big-time -- galactic time!

You oughta find someone more worthy of your admiration and defense, Timber.

These people are way beneath you.
 
 
No matter how you look at it, the Admin must now suffer the consequences - the $87 billion on top of an already $70 billion price tag is making a strain. Maybe we will get an "LBJ" around March or April  
 
 
I'm with Frank on this one: makes me wonder why timber keeps defending these scum. I second Frank's quote, "You oughta find someone more worthy of your admiration and defense, Timber."
 
 
Report on NPR this afternoon on All Things Considered about the renewed ruckus over the news that the CIA is seeking a Justice Department investigation into the news leaks about the identity of the wife of retired career diplomate, former Ambassador Joseph Wilson as a CIA operative. New information today indicates the story was offered to a half dozen reporters and Wilson says he holds the WH responsible.

Wilson disputed the administrations claims earlier this year about Iraq's weapons program. He denied that Iraq had tried to obtain raw uranium for a nuclear weapon from Niger.

This comes at a time when the administration is battling new questions about it's claims about WMD in Iraq. A letter from the top Republican and Democrat on the House Intelligence Committee has characterized the admin's case on WMD as "weak."

Wilson has said that he has "credible sources" that say Karl Rove "at a minimum did nothing to stop the leaks and may have condoned it." Wilson suggests that the leaks were intended to discourage others from coming forward with contradictory information about the WH's case for WMD in Iraq.

Charles Schumer is calling for an Independent Investigation into the matter, suggesting John Ashcroft, who was, of course, appointed by the president, will have a conflict of interest investigating a potential security breach by the WH.

This all comes at a time when the administration is on the defensive because of the continued attacks on soldiers in Iraq, the failure to find WMD, worries about the astronomical costs of the war and polls indicating a drop in the support numbers for the president's handling of Iraq and National security.

All this presents a very different picture than the one some conservatives on this board prefer to believe. We love ya, guys, but reeeeeeeeeeally, it's not all rosy for good ole GW at the moment. And looks like Karl Rove is going to begin to have his troubles too.
 
 
The Administration will claim that they do not want to put the country through all the partisan broohaha that happened during the Clinton Administration and will therefore keep the investigation with Ashcroft and the Justice Department which, in their eyes, is a totally independent organization anyway  
 
 
Probably a branch of Halliburton.
 
 
Committee chaired by Kenny-boy Lay  
 
 
Kenny may be too busy for committee work for a while:

 Is Ken's Cloaking Device Failing? 

 
SEC Seeks Documents From Ex-Enron Chief
MARTIN CRUTSINGER
Associated Press
Mon, Sep. 29, 2003
WASHINGTON - The Securities and Exchange Commission asked a federal judge Monday to force former Enron Corp. chairman Kenneth L. Lay to turn over documents sought for an SEC investigation of the bankrupt Houston energy company...
... In its court filing, the SEC said Lay had told the agency the documents in dispute included copies of Enron memoranda and other documents that included Lay's handwriting as well as copies of letters, position papers and drafts of speeches.

Through his attorneys, Lay had refused to produce the documents on the self-incrimination claim.

"The documents withheld by Lay, generated during his tenure at Enron, are corporate records," the SEC said in Monday's court filing. The agency said that there was no Fifth Amendment protection for the corporate records, and they must be turned over "even when the records might tend to incriminate the individual personally."
 

The SEC is not noted for poor fishing technique; they rarely jerk the rod unless they figure they're sinking the hook into a big one.
 
 
And Timber, you brought up the Clinton "lie" so I'll have to address it further........even though you say that only the fact of the "lie" is important.

Timber wrote:

 
Much the same sort of sophistry and subversion of fact exists in the popular myth that the impeachment of Clinton revolved around his affair with Lewinsky. The conviction and sanctions levied against him specifically address his having been proven to have lied under oath in the matter of Jones vs. Clinton. The text of the lie, the personages or events comprising the circumstance of the lie, nor any other aspect of the lie, simply are not germaine. The issue was that a lie, irrespective concerning what or whom, uncontestably was issued while under oath, a simple fact now clouded irretrievably by spin.
 

First of all Timber, I don't think there's an adult person alive who doesn't know that "it" was about the "lie," as was Paula Jones, and Kathleen Wiley and Jennifer Flowers. It was never about sex. It was about "It." "It" was about an attempt to take down a president by the very people who were accusing that president of telling a "lie."

Joan Didion, in "Uncovering Washington," in The New York Review of Books, June 24, 1999:

 
{The story was}... detailed by Renata Adler in the Los Angeles Times Book Review on March 14, 1999, that by the time Linda Tripp surfaced on the national screen as Monica Lewinsky's confidante she had already testified in four previous Office of the Independent Counsel investigations: Filegate, Travelgate, the Vincent Foster suicide, and Whitewater.

What we now know occurred during the past year was, in other words, a covert effort to advance a particular agenda by bringing down a president. We know that this covert effort culminated in the kind of sting operation that reliably creates a crime where a crime may or may not have otherwise existed. We knew all along that the "independence" of the independent prosecutor could have been, or should have been, open to some question, since, before his appointment as independent prosecutor, as was reported but allowed to pass unremarked upon in what passed for the "dialogue" on the case, he had consulted with the Jones legal team on the projected amicus curiae brief to be filed on behalf of the Independent Women's Forum arguing that Jones v. Clinton should go forward. The Jones lawyer with whom he consulted, Isikoff tells us, was Gil Davis, whose billing records show that the talks covered four and a half hours, for which Davis billed Paula Jones $775.

The clues were always there, as they had been for Isikoff. There was always in the tale of the foolish intern and her disloyal friend a synchronicity that did not quite convince. There was from the outset the occasional odd reference in a news story, the name here and there that did not quite belong in the story, the chronology that did not quite tally, the curiously inexorable escalation of Jones v. Clinton. At least some of this, in other words, would appear to have been knowable, but it remained unacknowledged in the narrative that was the official story.
 

In medicine we call an illness "iatrogenic" when it has been caused by the physician him/herself. The patient is the one with the illness, but it's the physician's fault that the patient is sick, that is the physician caused the illness. So we really shouldn't go on about the significance of the "lie." It's a moot point. Isn't this called entrapment in certain investigations? Isn't it against the law? Or at least it's not possible to charge a person with a crime they were set up to commit. Isn't that right? Or am I having another senior moment?
 
 
Good girl!
 
 
Is Bush's War in Iraq A "Brain Fart"?

Did retired General Anthony Zinni really call George W. Bush's war in Iraq a "brain fart"? That seems to be the case. But first, some background.

On Thursday night, Zinni, the former commanderof the U.S. Central Command, was interviewed by Ted Koppel on Nightline. And he was rather sharp in his assessment of George W. Bush's policy in Iraq. Before the war, Zinni, who had been an envoy for Bush in the Middle East, opposed a U.S. invasion of Iraq, arguing that Saddam Hussein did not pose an imminent threat. On Nightline, Zinni compared Bush's push for the war with the Gulf of Tonkin incident -- an infamous episode in which President Lyndon Johnson misrepresented an attack on two U.S. Navy destroyers in order to win
congressional approval of the war in Vietnam -- and he challenged "the credibility behind" Bush's prewar assertions concerning Iraq's possession
of weapons of mass destruction and its association with anti-American terrorists. "I'm suggesting," Zinni said, "that either the [prewar] intelligence was so bad and flawed -- and if that's the case, then somebody's head ought to roll for that -- or the intelligence was exaggerated or twisted in a way to make a more convenient case to the
American people." Zinni said he believed that Hussein had maintained "the framework for a weapons of mass destruction program that could be quickly activated once sanctions were lifted" and that such a program, while worrisome, did not immediately endanger the United States.

Zinni raised the issue that Bush might have purposefully misled the public and not shared with it the true reason for the war: "If there's a strategic decision for taking down Iraq, if it's the so-called neoconservative idea that taking apart Iraq and creating a model democracy, or whatever it is,
will change the equation in the Middle East, then make the [public] case based on that strategic decision... I think it's a flawed -- like the
domino theory -- it's a flawed strategic thought or concept... But if that's the reason for going in, that's the case the American people ought to hear. They ought to make their judgment and determine their support based on what the motivation is for the attack."

Zinni was, in a way, being polite. Earlier in the month, he addressed a forum sponsored by the U.S. Naval Institute and the Marine Corps
Association. There he let loose. Reflecting the views of high-ranking U.S. military officials who were dubious about launching a war against Iraq and skeptical about the occupation that would follow, Zinni accused the Bush crowd of having not been ready for the challenges to come after defeating the Iraqi army. "We're in danger of failing," he noted, because the Bush administration had not readied itself for what would follow the initial military engagement. "We fought one idiot here [in Iraq], just now," he said. "Ohio State beat Slippery Rock 62 to 0. No shit! You know! But we
weren't ready for that team that came onto the field at the end of that three-week victory." He went on:

"Right now, in a place like Iraq, you're dealing with Jihadists that are coming in to raise hell, crime on the streets that's rampant, ex-Ba'athists that still running around, and the potential now for this country to fragment: Shi'ia on Shi'ia, Shi'ia on Sunni, Kurd on Turkomen. It's a powder keg. I just got back from Jordan. I talked to a number of Iraqis there. And what I hear scares me even more that what I read in the newspaper. Resources are needed, a strategy is needed, a plan. This is a
different kind of conflict. War fighting is one element of it."

Zinni displayed little confidence in Bush and his aides. He said that their Iraq endeavor has landed the United States into the middle of assorted
"culture wars" in the Middle East. "We don't understand that culture," he remarked. "I've spent the last 15 years of my life in this part of the
world. And I'll tell you, every time I hear... one of the dilettantes back here speak about this region of the world, they don't have a clue. They don't understand what makes them tick. They don't understand where they are in their own history. They don't understand what our role is... We are
great at dealing with the tactical problems -- the killing and the breaking. We are lousy at solving the strategic problems; having a strategic plan, understanding about regional and global security and what it takes to weld that and to shape it and to move forward."

Do you think Zinni is angry over the war? He did get worked up as he ended his speech:

"We should be... extremely proud of what our people did out there... It kills me when I hear of the continuing casualties and the sacrifice that's
being made. It also kills me when I hear someone say that, well, each one of those is a personal tragedy, but in the overall scheme of things,
they're insignificant statistically." (Perhaps he had in mind the comment Defense Secretary Donald Rumsfeld made in June, when he played down attacks on U.S. troops in Iraq by saying, "You've got to remember that if Washington, D.C., were the size of Baghdad, we would be having something like 215 murders a month; there's going to be violence in a big city.") Zinn continued: "When we put [our enlisted men and women] in harm's way, it had better count for something, It can't be because some policy wonk
back here has a brain fart of an idea of a strategy that isn't thought out."

Brain fart? That's not quite a military term. But those are fighting words. And Zinni practically counseled his audience to rebel against the Bush
administration. U.S. troops, he said, "should never be put on a battlefield without a strategic plan, not only for the fighting -- our generals will take care of that -- but for the aftermath and winning that war. Where are we, the American people, if we accept this, if we accept this level of sacrifice without that level of planning? Almost everyone in this room, of my contemporaries -- our feelings and our sensitivities were forged on the
battlefields of Vietnam, where we heard the garbage and lies, and we saw the sacrifice. We swore never again would we do that. We swore never again would we allow it to happen. And I ask you, is it happening again? And you're going to have to answer that question, just like the American people are."

Brain fart. Garbage and lies. Never again. This was harsher rhetoric than Zinni deployed on Nightline, though his message was essentially the same.
With such talk, he is in sync with Senator Ted Kennedy, who was blasted by Republicans for calling the war a "fraud." Note to Kennedy and other critics of the war: Fire away. If a Republican counter-attacks, you can always reply, at least I didn't say Bush is asking Americans to give their
lives for a war based on mental flatulence.

-- David Corn, "Capital Games" (The Nation magazine, 26 September 2003)

 http://www.thenation.com/capitalgames/index.mhtml?bid=3&pid=977 
 
 
yes, c.i................Bush is going down. I can just feel it in my bones. We have Zinni over here speaking to The U.S. Naval Institute and the Marine Corps Association, saying (rather well, I think) we need a plan (and we do). And then over here we have General Wesley Clark running for President........... The year is really cranking up.

You know, last election year I watched the news coverage all year and everyone that knows me laughed at me for yelling at the television, shaking my fist in the air. I'm so happy this time, I have all of you.
 
 
Well, of course it was all nothing more than an insidiously crafted Republican plot to topple a sitting Democratic President by means of baseless accusation, evidence manipulation and scattershot investigation. Since you put it that way, the present situation, apart from the reversal of hunted and hunter, appears to coincide rather closely. I guess that validates the old aphorism "What goes around comes around"  
 
 
Gee, timber, didn't you catch the message? It's about Bush's war without a strategy, not a "Republican plot to topple a sitting Democratic President."
 
 
yeah, that's right. It's one thing to pee in your own post tosties............it's quite another for someone to force you into peeing there.
 
 
I'm here for you to shake your fist at anytime, Lola. Try not to shout too much though... the puppies are usually pretty much fine with sudden movements, but sudden noise gets 'em goin' somethin' awful.

And c.i., don't take this the wrong way, old buddy... but sometimes I just gotta shake my head at you :wink: I'm sure that's reciprocated.  
 
 
I do, really, feel all warm and cozy. Good night all.
 
 
Why? Did I have another senior moment?  
 
 
depends?
 
 
ahhhh, protection........  
 
 
Damn, am I already in that stage of my life?  
 
 
So you're the leak!  
 
 
Call the FBI!
 
 
Bush will make you a national hero - BTW, you are only missing an a.   (c.i.a.)
 
 
BillW, I forego the "a" for now. Too many negative possibilities. LOL
 
 
Angie said that Bush's quote made it seem not only that Saddam had WMD's but that he was going to use them.

Really?

Well, Angie, who said the following?

"And mark my words. he( Saddam) will develop weapons of mass destruction. He will deploy them and he will use them"

Who said it, Angie?

President William Jefferson Clinton in his speech on 12/16/1998.

You certainly don't think that President Bush should have ignored the speech and advice of the most brilliant foreign policy expert of the twentieth century, do you?
 
 
I am very much afraid that Lola doesn't know what she is talking about when she talks about "it" with regard to Clinton.

Lola quotes Joan Didion. I was not aware that Joan Didion was a legal expert.

Lola may not know who Judge Richard Posner is. He is fifty times more qualified to address the Clinton crimes than Didion is.

If Lola would not have too much trouble reading some legalese, I would direct her to the book by Judge Richard Posner, who, as the chief judge of the Court of Appeals of the Seventh Circuit and Law Professor at the University of Chicago's Law School is an expert on the subject.

Posner says: P. 54 in his book- "An Affair of State"

quote

"Even if, as I do not for a moment believe, none of President Clinton's lies under oath amounted to perjury in the strict technical sense, they were false and misleading statements designed to derail legal proceedings and so they were additional acts of obstruction of justice--as well as additional overt acts of a conspiracy to obstruct justice involving Clinton, Lewinsky,Currie, and possibly Jordan...An imaginative prosecutor could no doubt add counts of wire fraud, criminal contempt, the making of false statements to the government and aiding and abetting a crime...It is interesting to speculate on what punishment a person might recieve who committed the series of crimes that I have sketched....A conservative estimate of the outcome...would be a prison sentence of thirty to thirty seven months."

That is not Didion, Lola, that is one of the foremost legal experts in the country speaking..but it may be that you don't know the difference.
 
 
And, of course, Lola does not know that the Independent Council issued a report on Jan. 19th 2001( The last day of Clinton's tenure) in which the independent council noted that CLINTON HAD ACCEPTED A PLEA BARGAIN.

I do hope that Lola knows what a plea bargain is.

Innocent people do NOT accept plea bargains especially if they give up as much as Clinton did to avoid prosecution.

What did Clinton "give up"?

l. His law license for five years

2. He paid a $25,000 fine

3. He admitted lying in his deposition.

That, Lola,was what he did to avoid a possible prosecution by the special prosecutor.

I am sorry you did not follow the matter more closely.
 
 
One thing about "The Law"... it frequently functions in a manner inconsistent with its own interest. I consider plea-bargaining and "Undiscosed terms of settlement" to be such inconsistencies.

I notice particularly that Bush the Younger did not claim "Executive Privilige", but rather endorsed and initiated investigation, with an assertion that if wrongdoing is uncovered, "It will be taken care of".
We shall see. The Opposition picked the fight and has a lot riding on this... they don't need any more setbacks and embarrassments. If they can't make something of it, their credibility and standing will be considerably diminished.
 
 
Timber_ I do think that you would find that a "Plea Bargain" is not an inconsistency, as you put it.

A plea bargain, as I am sure you realize, is a process whereby the accused( Clinton) and the prosecutor in a criminal case work out a mutually satisfactory disposition of the case.

It appears that President Clinton was satisfied to dispose of the case by paying a $25,000 fine, having his law license suspended for five years and admitting to lying in his deposition.

There was no inconsistency there. It was straightforward. Clinton's lawyers advised him that it would be in his best interests to take the plea-bargain since they could not be sure that the special prosecutor would not indict him after he left office. It is most indicative that the plea bargain was done on the last day of Clinton's tenure in office.
 
 
Timber- and as for George W. Bush's statement about endorsing and initiating investigation, As you put it, I am afraid I do not know what you are referring to.

In any case, I do not see any connection of Clinton's dilemma to anything Bush has done since, to the best of my knowledge, Bush has not been impeached or deposed or even charged.

There is no parallel at all.
 
 
Gotta disagree with you, based on my contention that the process of plea-bargaining subordinates the law to money and/or mutual convenience. That I find wrong.
 
 
I draw no parallel beyond the fact one invoked Executive Privilige, while the other did not. regardless of context or circumstance. As I said, we shall see.
 
 
Timber- Do you then think that plea-bargaining should be removed from the practice of law?

If so, I hope that you are aware that the courts in this country would come to a dead stop since they would not be able to adjudicate all of the cases before them.

Many times, of course, the prosecutors push for the plea bargain--not for money and perhaps not for MUTUAL convenience. Many of the criminals would not want to be charged at all but the prosecutors offer the criminal a choice of pleading
guilty to a lesser charge.
Pragmatism calls for the plea bargain to remain as a device since it would cost far far more to prosecute every criminal who pleaded not guilty.
It is moot as to whether Society would be able to come up with the resources to hire so many more prosecutors and judges and court personnel that would be needed if all went to costly and time consuming trials.
 
 
I understand the pragmatism of plea bargaining. I just don't like the concept, regardless how inexpedient or unachieveable might be appropriate remedy. Its a necessary evil. Its still an evil.
 
 
Timber- Perhaps my memory is failing me but I feel quite sure that BOTH Clinton and George W. Bush invoked Executive Privilege.

Clinton when the Independent Prosecutor was looking for records relating to the documents of Mike Espy, former Secretary of Agriculture when they were looking for evidence that Espy took bribes

and

George W. Bush when there was a drive to obtain Cheney's Energy Task Force Records.

To the best of my recollection, federal judges upheld EXECUTIVE PRIVILEGE for Both Presidents.
 
 
No dispute there, Bush did invoke it re Cheney... a rather different circumstance, IMO, even if not so considered by others. I find his avoidance of same in the current circumstance indicative of more than mere plausible deniability.
 
 
Haven't had any documents requested as of yet, to the best of my knowledge - wait and see what unfolds, I also don't think he has any doubt that Ashcroft will "do the right thing".
 
 
Seems there's an "Official Memo" notifying WH staff to retain, preserve, and be prepared to produce any and all electronic and hardcopy information pertinent to the matter, as far back to February, I believe. That doesn't sound like a particularly sophisticated way to begin a coverup. If little else, I have confidence in the sophistication of the Current Administration. Them boys is slick, whatever else they may be. At the very least, a relatively highly placed head or two likely have already been selected to toss to the mob should need arise... possibly with neither the assent or knowledge of the possessors of those heads.
 
 
SOP though! Never know when ones' foot accidentally presses the record pedal when one is reaching across the room to answer the phone - for 17 minutes   or, whatever the similar incident was re: Clinton travel department eMails   and, then there was Ollie's shredder mishap - who knew they would put a 450 cubic inch with 3 dueces on it  
 
 
Yes, but, Timber( I just looked it up)

In BOTH cases, Clinton's refusal to release all of the material on Espy and Bush's refusal to release the records concerning the members meeting with Cheney in Energy meetings, a federal court judge

upheld the right of both presidents to invoke Presidential Executive Privilege.

Now, if a President would not release material after a judge had said that Executive Privilege did not apply in a certain case, that would indeed be unlawful.

But, I am sure you will agree, Timber, we must proceed according to the "rule of law".
 
 
Ahhh, yes... 'The Rosemary Woods Medal for Creative Editing this year goes to.... "
 
 
Absolutely, Italgato... matters should and will proceed as prescribed by law, and be decided by same if appropriate.
 
 
Italgato wrote: "Angie said that Bush's quote made it seem not only that Saddam had WMD's but that he was going to use them. Really?"

yes.

And Italgato wrote: "Well, Angie, who said the following?..... Who said it, Angie? President William Jefferson Clinton in his speech on 12/16/1998. "

I will gladly take your word on the veracity of this quote. And I will add that Clinton was apparently as wrong as Bush. Of course, Clinton did not use his belief as a justification to invade anything, did he Italgato, did he, did he, did he ?  
 
 
Say'n some'n and not acting on it is a different animal from say'n some'n and acting on it - especially when the say'n some'n is all wrong.
 
 
Oooops, we killed over 7,000 people on wrong information.
 
 
BillW,

Did you know that Arlo Guthrie was talking to Chip Carten at his father's inauguration party and Chip mentioned to Arlo that he had found a copy of Arlo's 1969 Alice's Restaurant in the WH library? Well, according to Arlo in his 1996 CD Alice's Restaurant The Massacre Revisited, in order to make the point to his live audience that a "movement" can change the course of the world, Arlo tells about this conversation. He goes on to remember that many years later on the occasion of Nixon's death, he and a group of his friends were sitting around talking about the WH tapes and how there was an 18 minute and 2 second blank space on those tapes. It wasn't until the middle of the night, that Arlo put these two peices of information together. Alice's Restaurant (the 1969 version) played for exactly 18 minutes and 2 seconds! So you see, a movement, An Alice's Restaurant movement can make a difference and change the world for the better. It's not always necessary to be pessimistic.  
 
 
While Cowboy Bush is acting like Don Quixote fighting windmills the nation flounders. Our educational system is not producing a quality product, the economy is in shambles, joblessness abounds and medical care which is allegedly the best in the world is not available to a large percentage of our population. Is this the mark of a successful administration?
Mr Bush it would seem has a set of confused priorities.
 
 
Atlantic Unbound | September 24, 2003

Politics & Prose | by Jack Beatty

"A Miserable Failure"

Will Bush be re-elected? Only if voters wittingly ignore his long list of failures while in office

.....

ith one phrase Dick Gephardt has defined the issue to be decided next November. Can a "miserable failure" of a president win re-election? Bush's victory would testify to a civic failure more dangerous to the American future than any policies implemented or continued during a second Bush term. A majority would have demonstrated that democratic accountability is finished. That you can fail in everything and still be re-elected president.

You can preside over the most catastrophic failure of intelligence and national defense in history. Can fire no one associated with this fatal chain of blunders and bureaucratic buck-passing. Can oppose an inquest into September 11 for more than a year until pressure from the relatives of those killed on that day becomes politically toxic. Can name Henry Kissinger, that mortician of truth, to head the independent commission you finally accede to. You can start an unnecessary war that kills hundreds of Americans and as many as 7,000 Iraqi civilians—adjusted for the difference in population, the equivalent of 80,000 Americans. Can occupy Iraq without a plan to restore traffic lights, much less order. Can make American soldiers targets in a war of attrition conducted by snipers, assassins, and planters of remote-control bombs—and taunt the murderers of our young men to "bring it on." Can spend hundreds of billions of dollars on nation building—and pass the bill to America's children. (Asked to consider rescinding your tax cut for the top one percent of taxpayers for one year in order to fund the $87 billion you requested from Congress to pay for the occupation of Iraq, your Vice President said no; that would slow growth.) You can lose more jobs than any other President since Hoover. You can cut cops and after-school programs and Pell Grants and housing allowances for the poor to give tax cuts to millionaires. You can wreck the nation's finances, running up the largest deficit in history. You can permit 17,000 power plants to increase their health-endangering pollution of the air. You can lower the prestige of the United States in every country of the world by your unilateral conduct of foreign policy and puerile "you're either with us or against us" rhetoric. Above all, you can lie the country into war and your lies can be exposed—and, if a majority prefers ignorance to civic responsibility, you can still be reelected.

Even Republicans must be capable of applying a cost-benefit analysis to this record of miserable failure. Their tax cuts on one side, the burden of Bush-begotten debt on their children on the other. And surely even Republicans breathe the air befouled by those power plants. I have it on good authority that the conservatives in the party do as well. Surely they must question the judgment of a President who proposes to turn Iraq into what James Fallows calls "the fifty-first state" in order to bring democracy to the Middle East—the kind of do-gooder fantasy conservatives have long ridiculed in liberals.

But the election won't be decided by Republicans and conservatives. Most will sacrifice independent judgment to ideology or party and vote for Bush. No, swing voters will pick the next President. They vote the man not the party, character not ideology. Many voted for Bush in 2000 because they liked him better than Al Gore—applying the standards of product acceptability to a job that entrusts its holder with the power to blow up the planet. Well, do they still "like" Bush? I fear many do. After all, he has spared them the embarrassment of having to discuss sex with their children. Swing voters like Bush's "image" as a strong leader, a CNN pundit claims. Are they incapable of looking behind that image and seeing the weak President who stayed away from the White House on September 11 because his Vice President said it was not safe for him to be there and whose PR people lied to cover up his failure of leadership? John F. Kennedy, as R. W. Apple wrote on the front page of The New York Times on September 12, remained in the White House throughout the Cuban missile crisis knowing that it would be hit in any nuclear exchange with the Soviet Union.

The Founders feared that the republic would succumb to corruption without republican citizenship—without citizens who could transcend privatism and hold elected officials to account, demanding probity and competence, and judging their performance against both the clamorous necessities of the time and the mute claims of posterity. They made property a criterion for voting because it secured a measure of economic independence. Property-less wage laborers, they feared, would vote as their employers instructed them to. The extension of democracy to those who could not rise to the responsibilities of republican freedom would corrupt the republic—hasten its decay into oligarchy or mob rule.

For all their worldliness the Founders were naïve to regard property as a shield of incorruptibility or the property-less as inherently corruptible. Their core insight, however, remains valid. A republic can be corrupted at the top and bottom, by leaders and led. The re-election of George W. Bush would signal that a kind of corruption had set in among the led. Our miserable failure as republican citizens would match his as President.
 
 
Now, that certainly reads like a setup piece for the Democrat's post-election whining. Now, its understandable The Demcrats and The Republicans will have some friction. Its natural in matters of dispute and contention for a pary perceiving disadvantage attribute to the advantaged party such things as deceit, treachery, venality, and assorted other corruptions. Now the Democrats posit that only a failure of the people could account for Republican success.

 
The re-election of George W. Bush would signal that a kind of corruption had set in among the led. Our miserable failure as republican citizens would match his as President.
 

And, now, c'mon.... "... corruption had set in among the led " ? What's that about... the electorate at large is mindless as sheep and as despicable as Republicans? Yeah, right... that'll drive the swing voter, the all-importatant, poorly understood, vastly underestimated center straight into the Democratic camp. Sure it will. Go for it. Please.

I really get the sense the Democrats, naturally who don't like what The Current Administration is doing, are sorely dismayed that he's doing well enough at it as to be of significant inconvenience to the prosecution of their own partisan agenda. The foreseeable political future lies with credibility, probity, and demonstrated performance, in equal amount. I can understand why The Democrats are convinced we are in the midst of a calamity. It sure must look like one to them.
 
 
Poll Shows Drop in Confidence on Bush Skill in Handling
Crises
By TODD S. PURDUM and JANET ELDER
Thirteen months before the 2004 election, a solid majority
of Americans say the country is seriously on the wrong
track.

 http://www.nytimes.com/2003/10/03/national/03POLL.html?th 

Shall we call this an awakening?
 
 
More Bad  NEWS  for those hoping for bad news:

 
U.S. Posts First Job Gains in 8 Months
Fri October 3, 2003 09:15 AM ET
By Glenn Somerville

WASHINGTON (Reuters) - U.S. employers added new jobs in September for the first time in eight months, the Labor Department said on Friday in a surprise twist for financial markets, which had been braced for more losses.

The number of workers on U.S. payrolls outside the farm sector grew by 57,000 last month, the first time since January that jobs were created and sharply contrary to Wall Street economists' forecasts for a 30,000-job loss.

... The Labor Department also revised its estimate for August job performance to show 41,000 jobs were lost instead of 93,000.

"It's a relief," said economist John Silvia of Wachovia Securities in Charlotte, North Carolina.

"It's very important that finally the employment numbers are kicking in and suggesting we are getting moderate employment growth, certainly not of the size of a typical economic recovery, but we are getting job growth," he added.
 
 
 
Timber
Bad news regarding the economy has been with us so long that anything positive is like a port in a storm.
Don't crow too soon it maybe just a hiccup. After all a little blip does not a recovery make.
 
 
interesting and i assume it to be good news, but why is it that we can take an indicator of such news and use it to forecast what may lay ahead while at the same time take other indicators such as no WoMD found and reserve judgement with a wait and see perspective? are we being a bit over-selective about omens of future tense? is this a consistent methodolgy?
 
 
Trade and Industry Editor

INTEREST rate cuts, attractive incentive packages and low levels of consumer debt helped boost sales of new cars to a seven-year high last month.

The jump in sales has led the National Association of Automobile Manufacturers of SA (Naamsa) to predict that annual sales growth this year will reach 5%.

Naamsa's latest figures, released yesterday, show that sales of all new vehicles climbed 14,7% in September, from the 35173 sold a year ago. New car sales shot up 19,9% to 24020, thanks to "continued high demand from rental companies, improved vehicle affordability, attractive incentive packages, together with recent interest rate reductions and expectations of further interest rate cuts".

"Interestingly, the September 2003 new car sales performance represented the highest monthly new car market in just under seven years since October 1996," Naamsa said.

The September vehicle sales showed an increase for the third successive month.
 
 
I don't know about anyone else but unless there is a sustained improvement over one or two quarters, they can "revise" statistics until they are blue in the face. I'm not a pessimist but although I'm not from the "show me" state -- show me the money. The deficit continuing to rise will still be working as a damper on the economy. As usual, the alchemists...er...economists are polarized and this administration isn't any less polarized.
 
 
With this administration, forecasting the state of the economy is like forecasting the weather using no instruments but a wet finger thrust up in the air.
 
 
'in THE AIR'!? Damn, that explains a lot of washed out picnics!
 
 
I think I know where they've actually got their finger and it ain't in the air!

 
 
 
General: 3-6 GIs die each week in Iraq
BAGHDAD, Iraq (AP) -- An average of three to six Americans are killed each week in Iraq and another 40 are wounded by a foe that has become more lethal and sophisticated since the fall of Baghdad in April, the commander of coalition forces said.

 http://www.cnn.com/2003/WORLD/meast/10/02/sprj.irq.casualties.ap/index.html 

I am still waiting for Bush to comment on the loss of American life and casualties in his war. Bad press I would suppose.
 
 
